For a slim figure,
Recently, following the end of a long-term romantic relationship, family and friends seemingly expected me to be depressed and constantly in tears. “Aren’t you sad?,” “I’m so sorry,” “That sucks,” and “Aren’t you lonely?” were among the most frequent phrases and questions I heard from loved ones in the post-breakup months. It was probably extremely confusing to them when I would laugh a bit or smile and say, “it’s ok,”
One ad said "more doctors smoke camels than any other cigarette".
This is not old news, it was in January 2012.
If it is only the pure in heart who see God, what corresponding purity of heart is needed to hear God? How often have we dismissed His word because it has come through an earthen vessel not of our choosing and whose accent and coloration conceals God, but does not make Him mute? Better to choose to believe God in that speaking than to dismiss it as man.
For instance, on problem noted is that units experience a great deal of turnover immediately after deployment, with lots of people transferred out and new folks coming in. The contention is that this happens so early in the reset phase that it causes a lot of problems. But the fact is, you have to move those people early to allow the gaining units, and the parent unit, to bed down their new people, and start the training cycle. How do you address the first issue without knock-on problems with the second?
On the other hand, objects that bore me now would seem like a wonderful treat if my activities today, tomorrow, and everyday well into the future could be predicted with relative surety. I can imagine that the miners rapidly learned to adjust their expectations, and ordinary objects would take on a new meaning when life is simplified in such a way. They would, and will continue to, concentrate on surviving in a world that is suddenly much smaller. There is a chance that they would never take anything for granted again.
On tracks like “Talking at the Same Time,” Waits shows off a supple falsetto, while on blues burners like “Raised Right Men” and the gospel tinged “Satisfied” he spits, stutters and howls. Like a good boxer, these songs are lean and mean, with strong hooks and tight running times. A pervasive sense of players delighting in each other’s musical company brings a feeling of loose joy even to the album’s saddest songs.
JSB—The version passed around Huntsville was that a squirrel had gotten in the generator in the middle of the night.
If both of us could clearly see,
I make the argument that there is a healthy kind of gossip and it can be quite a useful for one’s mental health. As long as it’s with people who get that it’s not malicious and you trust won’t repeat what you are saying, it’s a way of venting and getting all the bad emotions out so it won’t build up inside you and make you crazy and follow you home. Sometimes getting affirmation about your feelings can be wonderful and necessary. This is gossip, I am totally guilty of.
But am I a work in progress?
I hope CNN will not be fooled in making the mistake of including Pacquiao with our authentic national heroes, as they are planning to do in this TV series ‘Eye on the Philippines.’ It will be deception of the first order and that is not what CNN is all about.
Trenton Robinson
While I quite like Austen's work, I'm not the biggest of fans myself, and the one novel I've had trouble with in the past is Sense and Sensibility, a book I read a couple of times in my youth. A spate of reviews recently brought it to mind, and (as I was in the middle of my Women Writers Month) I thought I would give it another try. Did I end up loving it, or was I able to find out what it is about the book that puts me off ? Patience, patience...
Welcome to the 50 States Blog Hop! Most of us would love to travel but are having staycations this year. What better way to travel but through a blog hop. This hop was inspired by our host Shawnee's journey across the United States as she traveled with her family to their new home. The United States is truly beautiful with many wonderful places to visit and see.
And how was the book?
1175 **D-XI/7/1993. “Who Is Job’s Job?” Basic Program Weekend Conference, The University of Chicago, Alpine Valley Resort, East Troy, Wisconsin. (Incorporated in Item C-1998(12), above, pp. 681-91.)
Am I supposed to take it on myself
Two of my poems were published in Hopscotch - a collection of children’s short stories and poetry, published by Jelli-Beanz Publishing. Since the book’s official launch in March 2012, Jelli-Beanz Publishing has been interviewing authors whose work appears in this delightful collection.
Times change, people move on.
Greyhound Girl
Bake at 350 for 6 minutes.
Producer:Karan Johar, Hiroo Johar
Take my elbow. Please.
iPad only
Always together,
The meeting is not productive for them, but one doctor stays behind. He knows who Frankenstein really is and blackmails to become his assistant. Frankenstein shows him the experients he is working on. Most involve severed limbs, of course. The masterpiece plan is to place the brai of a brilliant, but crippled colleague into a new body.
"Like when I'm 32?"
I am not even entirely sure what a yarn is. Mark Twain was popular in his own time, so all the popular books? Books where the character tells outrageous lies?
Today, a reader who had searched the blog archive wrote:
“When they write my obituary. Tomorrow. Or the next day. It will say, Leo Gursky is survived by an apartment full of shit”
Web What spiders make
I didn't reply to any of my fellow bloggees comments last week. Because, I'm ashamed to admit, I put the edited bit back and not only that, I added more. So I have a 133k m/s to edit down to 100k and I've edited up to 137k. Ha.
I am also excited about meeting up with the crew at Melton waves again this week for a training session. Last time I burnt 396 calories in just over an hour, so hope to better that number this week.
This section of Mark was probably not part of the original writing of Mark. This was more than likely an addition to Mark because someone or a group of people didn’t like the ending of the women running away in fear saying nothing. So why did the person who added this had the idea of adding this part of snakes and poisons and that people would not be effected by this. I’m not sure how this linked to the ending of Mark. Why do we think we have to have all the answers and know exactly everything that could happen?
Humans and androids crowd the raucous streets of New Beijing. A deadly plague ravages the population. From space, a ruthless lunar people watch, waiting to make their move. No one knows that Earth’s fate hinges on one girl. . . . Cinder, a gifted mechanic, is a cyborg. She’s a second-class citizen with a mysterious past, reviled by her stepmother and blamed for her stepsister’s illness. But when her life becomes intertwined with the handsome Prince Kai’s, she suddenly finds herself at the center of an intergalactic struggle, and a forbidden attraction. Caught between duty and freedom, loyalty and betrayal, she must uncover secrets about her past in order to protect her world’s future.
5. The $8.91 in my bank account
More than this, my worries came back. Usually I will read about something and then develop the symptoms psycho-somatically. I was worried that this little seed would erupt into some sort of made up illusion that I’ve been so used to lately.
Issues like:
This vague term was seldom resisted: most academics and administrators voluntarily embraced it though there was no agreement as to what it meant. For some it meant a voyage of personal change - it was easily assumed that all whites were racists to some extent and needed a bit of healthy brain-washing. Others saw it as being about changing syllabi or gender equality or affirmative action. It meant all of these things and more and in general it meant changing in an ANC-directed way.
You have One month to enter, the prize is a $10.00 voucher to spend in the Hooked on Craft store, which has some fabulous crafting goodies and is well worth a visit.
The word "audit" may be part of the problem here. Its so dull, so compliance-focused.
We learn that he liked friends who surprised him and that if he had the choice between going to see a concert of old music and new music he would always choose the new because he wanted to hear something he’d never heard before.
Well, how am I getting on with my impossible list of stuff to do?
and he with me."
I think it is a plea for affection and appreciation to be articulated, and a recommendation for communication of the positive. So in my circumambulatory way I should like to say thank you to all of you who have posted such interesting and supportive comments on my last few posts - it is so cheering to be the recipient of such encouraging feedback. And I in my turn appreciate you for taking the time to respond so constructively.
Milan Petrović: Excellent relationship between Slavic and Nordic pagans can be observed during annual Slavic and Viking festival in Wolin, Poland (this year the XVII festival was held). There is also number of adherents of Nordic religion among Slavs. In Asian parts of Russia there is some relationship with local shamans. Relations with other pagan religions are not so organised and vary between local groups of Slavic pagans (and of course vary on availability of adherents of other pagan religions). Relations with adherents of neo-pagan religions usually fall into category of personal contacts. One has to bare in mind that Slavic pagans are not so organised, with exemption of Russia, Poland and Ukraine, as their West European counterparts are. There is also linguistic barrier – Slavic people understand each other quite well and they are largest group in Europe, so they can quite easily find someone to talk to among themselves. There is some interest among Slavs for some of the neo-pagan religions, e.g. Wicca. On the other hand, pagans from West Europe often have no idea of the very existence of Slavic religion or growing number of Slavic pagans. I hope this article would lead to establishing connections between Slavic pagans and members of other pagan and neo-pagan religions and improving inter-pagan relationship.
I am the soft starlight at night.
girlfriends kicked me
Russell wrote:
I wasn’t doing research on cancer, but on a subject that came to me this morning as I was waking up. Anyway I found this, and thought it was so important, I wanted to share it with you, so you can share it with those you love.
“You pushed her.”
Geometry was a bit of a mystery to the young Charon – but over time, and through necessity, he came to understand the principles. Now geometry fascinates Charon more in the shape than the practical application and for the possibilities of optical illusion. If one looks at the two circles in the middle of the painting; soon one sees a cylinder, for the brain fills in the lines to connect the circles…and then the cylinders appear to change direction. I put this to Charon. He told me: “See what you like, mate…. When I look into the circle at the bottom left, I am looking down into a wine bottle and it has wine in it… this is good. When I look at the circle on the right, I am looking down into the bottle and there is no wine in it and I can even see the bar code. This is not good. When I look at the circle top right… it is the morning after and things, sometimes, are a bit bright. I have no idea who did the circles and geometry in the middle… it is possible that I may have been burgled during the night.”
Worn:
Hubby: Are you sure you didn’t miss?
Marinade the fish with all the ingredients and set it aside for 15 minutes. Spread out an aluminium foil and put the fish on it. Pour all the excess gravy into the foil. Wrap it up and bake in preheated oven at 200 Deg C for 25 minutes. Serve with white rice.
Put the raisins and about 75 ml (5 tbs) of water in a small saucepan and bring to the boil. Remove from the heat, cover, and leave until the raisins have absorbed most of the liquid. You don’t have to do this but it makes the raisins very plump and juicy. Drain and leave to one side. Heat a dry frying pan/skillet over a medium heat and add the fennel seeds, shaking the pan so they toast evenly. They are ready when they start to release their fragrance and are beginning to brown; then whizz them in a spice or coffee grinder for a few seconds.
I love(d) school.
The sun was setting when he finally crossed the state line into his native state. He would soon be bidding I-81 goodbye as its terminus at I-40 near Dandridge was only a few exits from his present position. Once again the finger of his mind ran over the mental map. His time on Interstate 40 would be brief as he would then have to pick up I-75. Once on 75 he would drive straight on through to Chattanooga.
07. Nostromo Dept. – Evolution (Dali S. mix) (6:08)
EVEN NUMBERS is B. Grovner’s first book and is a story of a young girl who was molested by her father and then ultimately raised by him. She would like to keep the subject of child molestation and child rape in the forefront of our minds.
It doesn’t matter how many leadership books youhave read, how much leadership intellect you have or if you have obtained an awesome leadership role. If any of the following 3 statements about leadership are true about you, then you are not really leading.
but an art I’ve been learning
JCL Nice to have 1 Years 2 – Proficient
There will be a random prize draw for one of the folks that enter,
So, the question remains, if you want to go for a drink in an urban or suburban area, in somewhere that is smart and contemporary, where you can avoid chavs, scruffy ale aficionados and hacking, mild-drinking old boys, where do you go?
But Elouise Spooner, 82, said Sherrod’s efforts were good enough for her. “She gave enough that it helped us save our farm,” she told CNN in an interview today.
When a patentee offered evidence of copying by the accused infringer, willfulness was found almost two-thirds (62.7%) of the time. In contrast, when there was no evidence that the accused infringer had copied, willfulness was found less than a third (29.9%) of the time. Copying was particularly important when judges made the final decision on willfulness, as the absence of any evidence of copying almost always (92.3%) resulted in a finding of no willfulness.
2011 Rep House List; Sister Rye
I have many tiles from Antique and Vintage dinnerware in my CremeMagnolia Etsy store and below are a couple of examples. Learning to cut tiles is an ardious process that many don't undertake. My store sells mosaic tiles at the lowest possible prices!
Monkey: Ah ah ah!
I aim to touch lives all around the world.
After seeing how fast the process went using the zipper (i.e., food processor)...I decided to make a 2nd batch and see how fast it really is....4 minutes people! 4 minutes to made laundry soap (which means I actually have plenty of time to get some work done...damn!) I'm storing it in an airtight container from Ikea so it doesn't get sticky, since our laundry room tends to get a little humid.
if no-one does a thing because of me
If you are searching for that perfect present for a crafty friend or relative then look no further than their Christmas Shop. There's a wide selection of gifts and crafting kits to suit all tastes and budgets. Each comes with a bonus gift absolutley FREE, plus double loyalty points with each item.
Now, I should point out at this point that my family is VERY big on reading. Bookshelves line every free wall in our house, filled with everything from sci-fi and fantasy novels, to cookbooks, to locomotive repair books, to encyclopedias, to natural health books, and a thousand other things. From the time I was tiny, the people around me, my parents, were regular readers. And from the time I was tiny, they read aloud to me. Poetry, the newspaper, picture books, you name it. Words were something I appreciated from a young age.
Spiritual conflict has been a part of human experience from that time on. Genesis 3:15 provides a key element in establishing the context in which all the rest of the Bible must be viewed:
With that out of the way here are the benefic and malefic planets.
3. Party Down
I wish these were uncommon stories. But I hear them all the time. In a country like the United States where eating disorders have been observed, treated, and diagnosed for over half a century, it is shameful and tragic and wrong that people are dying from a treatable and preventable problem in record numbers.
No we can’t — not with credit lines restricted and credit card APRs now shooting through the roof. My bank is charging me $10 every time I use my overdraft protection (line of credit) — this in addition to the usurious interest rate they charge on the balance and cutting my line of credit from $20,000 to $15,000 — because…they can.
The rug is from Stark. (10/26)
For he ruled over all the kingdoms west of the River, from Tiphsah to Gaza, and had peace on all sides. During Solomon’s lifetime Judah and Israel, from Dan to Beersheba, lived in safety, each man under his own vine and fig tree. (1 Kings 4:24-25, NIV)
Lastly, there is my wife's low tolerance for toys with loud, annoying sounds or large numbers of pieces to clean up. When Amari's friends come over, dominoes and blocks disappear, puzzles find their way to high counter tops, and keyboard, guitars, and creepy bear somehow end up in the laundry room. Although in her work life, her drive and attention to detail knows no equal, at home that same level of motivation (what I call preventative parenting - it's the best medicine) used to hide the toys in the first place will also leave them there until her old, forgetful husband stumbles upon them and thinks, "I don't remember putting this here."
Is "Eeyi-Eeyiyo" the name of the farm or the sound the old farmer MacDonald makes when s/he has to get up in the early morning to feed all of those chickens, ducks, sheep, etc?
1. High fibre foods take longer to leave our stomach, therefore making us feel fuller for longer, good food then, if you are aiming to manage your weight. This idea may be more complex than just adding fibre to processed food or supplements for example; high fibre foods take longer to eat also, which also may have additional effects on satiety.
Once inside the building, Xu Guan took stock of his surroundings. The building did, indeed, appear to be a maintenance shed. It was filled with all manner of containers with flowers, grasses and weeds on their labels. Xu Guan could not read the English labels, but he could guess at what was inside based upon the pictures. There were numerous hand tools and a riding lawn mower like Xu Guan had seen used on the large lawns at the military bases where he had been stationed.
And THAT, my friends, was my travel break. *takes a bow*
artLedge is proud to present SPRING BREAK CHICAGO 2005 at the legendary Butcher Shop. Occupying the entire Butcher Shop gallery, this exhibition unites the efforts of 100 artists with an evening of festivities to thoroughly engage your senses. Come celebrate the global spring break phenomenon, relish in the emergence of spring, and take part in one of the most exciting events of the season.
I think I want to see that.
Suddenly his jaw set and his eyes narrowed. “I didn’t make a mistake by not marrying you twenty years ago! I let you go to become a success in life—and you did. I can’t regret that!”
Private Moore entered service July 16, 1918. Was attached to 6th Company, Coast Artillery Corps, September Automatic Replacement Draft, Ft. Screven, Ga. Embarked for over-sea s in September, 1918, sailing on the ill-fated transport “Otranto,” which was sunk off the Scottish Coast in a collision October 6, 1918. Private Moore was one of the soldiers drowned.
The challenge is now open to everyone whether they use a KD image or not. However, only those using KD images will be entered to win the Top Card of the Week prize. So now there is NO excuse not to join us!!!!
Mom's little helpers:
I voted for a person I thought understood right and wrong.
I put my 27 year old mare Promise to sleep 07/28/2011, she has been rapidly declining over the past few weeks. Please allow me to share with you the precious time we had her in our care.
you don't need to tell me it's a simultaneous submission. I assume you're querying widely. Unless an agent specifically requests to know that you can leave it out. And you don't want to spend words on something you don't need to say. Use as many words to entice me to read this instead of covering housekeeping matters.
But the tight security measures run the risk of reducing the popularity of the Games among Londoners already complaining about the 9.3 billion pounds cost and the disruption to ordinary people’s lives, particularly commuters.
He reminded me that many years ago I agreed that one day we could just 'wing it a bit' with regard to holidays, when we didn't have kids to consider...because when we had kids to consider/carry/feed/play with etc., I always needed to know where we were going, for how long, what the accommodation was like, what kind of weather did I need to pack the many bags for etc., etc., whereas now it is just the two of us and we can have more of an adventure....hhhhmmmmm. He tells me we need only hand luggage, and he promises it will be hot so just shorts (me? in shorts??? oh well as long as I don't scare local animals and small children) and t shirts with maybe just a jumper for the night time. The word rustic was used a few times...not sure if he meant where we are going or my knees.
They were both brought to task and shamefaced (well, Rich was anyway), they cleaned the toilet together. Of course I had to remind them to use a cleaning agent. Honestly, did they really think I was just going to let that one get by?
How to Be Human
Some Odd Girl is offering all Stamp Something readers a 30% off coupon code. This offer is good from June 4th through the 18th. Please use the code SS30.
love is BLIND
"Think globally, act locally."
Here is your chariot to Lush Limited at the Kawaii Fair, running now though Saturday, April 28. Also mark your calendar for Lush Limited’s very first show happening on May 4th at 6pm where they will introduce their new Spring/Summer line.
The cancer was detected last week during a routine check. Papillary carcinoma is the most common type of thyroid cancer and normally affects people under the age of 40, especially women.
My only complaint about the E.P. is that it’s an E.P. and not a full-length album. I hope that’s something on Williams’ to-do list.
Of course, the crowning moment of the evening was the presentation of the Mary Higgins Clark award by Mary Higgins Clark herself. The award is for a traditional mystery featuring a female amateur sleuth. This year, the nominees were
Social media itself has changed writing online – making it more informal and personal. In fact, when you’re writing online these days, you’re writing not only for your audience but also for search engines and social media sites. Add Twitter to the equation and the need to communicate with only 140 characters raises writing for the social web to a new art form.
When I cut into it, though, I decided that the crumb looked okay. Too late, I remembered the cake-testing sheets that Woody had left at my house, and I didn't measure the cake's height. Sorry, Woody. Someday I may be more scientific in my approach.
And herein lies the rub, folks: Mr New has been nothing but fabulous.
Any way, because of light and fascination with that, I found this great photos inspired by them. It's like a 'idea bulb', allegorically. Shine, gold, warmth, shadows.
The new anti-princess of pop has certainly penned some catchy tracks and performs them tonight complete with trademark jerky dancing and gravelly vocals. She’s a lady of few (unsung) words and partakes in minimal interaction with an audience who love her – instead jumping from one polished song to the next.
Other - box was painted green to match the dp, flowers are from pretty petals and where inked with antique linen, ribbon, lace from Kaiser, large wood beads for feet (which where painted white with watered down acrylic paint), Stampin up antique brads, and finally the clock face - I could not find one that I both liked and that was the right size, so this one is computer generated, printed onto acetate and layered in front of the image.
A: The inspiration for the line was the autumn season, especially October in Northern California, and all that I find beautiful about it. The leaves begin to turn and the acorns drop from the trees. As I walk my kids to school I watch as the fallen pieces turn this wonderful shade of warm brown. The whole season is such a source of color inspiration.
5 OLD, Petersburg Virginia, by Gordon Stettinius (ekphrastic and syllabic, from a photograph in Staniar Gallery that made me think of my daughter’s recent birthday)
Farmer #1: (wiping his brow with a bandanna) Whew! Well I guess that’s it then, here’s our plan for this year's crops.
What adventure would you like to find for your next trip? Do you wish more sites were like this where they customize trips based on your passions?
Sprinkle with dried fruit, of course, some peel is extra good
With my cell phone being our main house phone, I need to keep track of it. I have a hard time with that especially when I wear pants that have no pockets. I will take the cell phone and being a Mama of 6 instantly forget where I put it. Then DH calls from work, I never hear the phone and he doesn't have the option of calling the house phone because we don't have one. The Pami Pocket has made my DH very happy! I can just put my phone in the pocket, sling it around my neck and have it near by all day. It is a nice light weight pouch that I barely even notice throughout the day. Not cumbersome or in the way at all. When it is always on me I don't forget to grab it when I run outside either. Perfect solution for being able to wear your phone without having it attached to a belt, or in your pocket.
She was back there in her carseat going, "P-P-P--ah-ah-ah...Pah...rrr..rrr.rr..k.k.k.....Pa---rk. Pa---rk. Pa-rk. Pa-rk. PARK! I wanna go to the park!!!"
But what takes place in the metro media space often conditions government's response to any number of issues. Take the Indonesian abbattoir scandal as an example. It only took one ABC TV program on one night last year for the government to shut down the export of livestock to that country. Because rural businesses, especially those in northern Australia, rely so heavily on that particular export business, the fallout for the farmer in, say, the Northern Territory, was tremendous. That farmer felt not only isolated geographically, but ignored by the metro media who he or she felt was paying too much attention to animal rights groups and not enough attention to the economic and other impacts hitting the region as a result of the shutdown of trade.
new local bands?
I’m the sort of teacher who would very much like to think that she’s reflective – I put a lot of thought into my teaching, I view it as a continually developing process rather than a fixed artefact, I like experimenting with assessments and in-class activities. You know the sort of thing (or at least, I hope you know the sort of thing). However, my attempts to keep a reflective teaching journal have, as a rule, flopped. The one I tried to keep in my first course ever degenerated into a list of notes of things to follow up for the next class, which isn’t a bad thing per se but doesn’t exactly merit the description of ‘reflective’. The notes I kept when I knew I was going to be presenting on a particular class in the course and its content were a bit better, but I was very focused on how the course was leading up to that one key lesson, and didn’t really think about the course more broadly, or about anything unrelated to the issues I planned to discuss in the conference paper.
Mosoma’s version of how the roof collapsed was disputed by the chairperson of the Masemola ­Local and Long Distance Taxi Association Danie Mohlala, taxi drivers and hawkers, who believed it happened because poor quality materials had been used.
so that others could go on.
*Stamp and Create. Thank you Lacey for your awesome MMSC44 bonus prize. Be sure to check out her store for all the newest releases. They are very cute!!
What do you think will happen if a white man simply walks up to a black woman shoots her at point blank range and kills her? Would they call him a racist? Would the media have it as main news as a sign of a racist killing?
Sat reading near the fountain, among a nice mix of Dutch and expats while children were playing on the green, at the fountain, and around a statue. It all had a nice, laid-back feel about it.
2. Library Thing- This one is similar to Goodreads and I admit I don't use it as much but they also give away books through their Early Reviewers program and for that, they make my list.
The Jessica Simpson baby watch is finally over.
Section 2.2 of the Restitution Act says that if the claimant had previously (at the time of his removal) received compensation, he or she may not apply again. (Italics ours). Many claimants in terms of the Restitution Act have in fact received compensation, yet they lodge claims all the same. Most claims are lodged in respect of specific land to which claimants want to return, irrespective of whether other land or compensation had been granted in the past.
Check out some excerpts from Todd’s article below:
Let’s finish with two questions. Yep, two. What do you make of the beer? If you had to assign it a style, which would you pick? I – putting arguments as to whether or not it’s a single beer or a style aside – can kinda see this as an ESB. The malt profile hits me all very-small-barley-wine and that just makes me think Extra Special Bitter.
No matter how closely they emulate what I do, they can’t re-create the passion I have for something. Just the other day, a friend of mine asked me this very question. I asked her, “Do you still have passion for real estate?” Her eyes welled up with tears and she found it hard to admit that she didn’t. But she was throwing her hands up in the air, not knowing what else to do. “I desperately need to get some money on the table,” she said, “My family is depending on me.”
Now, all of y'all know I do NOT "do" flowers! I see all of these lovely cards with absolute bouquets on them and see how beautiful they are....and then when I try to do that, it just looks like I've slapped some artificial flowers on there (as I've said before). I'm trying once again with this card though - and yes, it probably does look like I slapped them on here but I actually took my time with them and tried to arrange them in somewhat of a decent manner! I kept wanting to use "the rule of three", but three were too many, one was not enough, and two are what you get!!! That sort of sounds like Goldilocks and the Three Bears! LOL!! They're a mauve color and go with the pink and plum pretty good. I used the Heart embossing folder on the Pretty in Pink panel and the DP is from Paper Studio. I also used some Perfect Plum - it actually matches (in a lighter shade) the solid background on the DP but I can't get the camera to cooperate with that it seems! I off-set the oval and lacy oval nesti and then added the image that was colored with Prisma pencils.
I have been getting a lot of email questions lately. Most of which I can't answer.
Unfortunately, I took a bunch of awesome photos (for once) and then realized that my camera’s USB cord is back home at my parent’s house. Hopefully, I’ll be able to find a way to get these photos off to show you, but I’m also positive that Steven took just as many photos (of much better quality) and isn’t a total klutz that lost his camera cable.
(Replace the 100 by whatever number you want - in my case 15 because there were 15 entries.)
The world of SMUDGE is a world of people devastatingly affected by their lack of connection to each other, either fighting for it or pushing back against it, always fully aware that there is nothing else more important in life than to deal with the nature of those connections head on. It is there that I find admiration for the four of them, for even in those most desperate of times, they refuse to yield to their isolation. They
19. If you even put a saddle on an ostrich, chances are Sam could ride it.
This story makes no sense. I don't know what my problem is. I don't know why I compulsively write about the psych ward, like I miss it. My life is so normal and wonderful right now, you know. I should just shut the fuck up.
What a great concept, by the way - drop the key off at the desk when you leave,
Sometimes I think about moving to the guest room because I feel my restlessness is disturbing, but I am old fashion and want to drop my head on the pillow every night next to the man I love.
So my attitude has changed and I’ve found lots of things I like.
my favorite author is Richard laymon who is a horror/thriller writer please be warned that his writing is rather graphic and gruesome and wont be perfect for everybody..
Sixteen years ago in April my Dad was making rounds in the hospital (he is an Oncologist) when he had massive heart attack resulting in a triple bypass. Had he not been in the hospital at the time of the attack the result would have been tragic. This past week, almost to the day, we relived these events with very serious heart problems resurfacing again, this time while in a doctor's care. Without going into much detail, it was a long few days with a very, very blessed ending.
I meekly asked the hotel proprietor where I might find "clothing items like T-shirts and jeans" on a Sunday and she directed me to the nearby humane society thrift store. I'm pretty cheap, folks, but not cheap enough to buy used underwear. If that is my only option, I will be free balling it for the remainder of this here vacation.
- Occupy Brooklyn, whose march against stop-and-frisk policing in Brownsville yesterday garnered national headlines (see video above), host their next General Assembly today (Thursday) at the Flatbush Development Corporation (890 Flatbush Ave, Church Ave B-Q stop) at 7pm.
brave!
You got your move, Fernando
Well, we thought today was going to be the big day. But it's not...
They are SO READY FOR THIS!
"Eat your Vegetables" Turkey Burger on a Ciabatta Roll with Melted Gouda. YUM.
(4) Ambrose Joshua Smith
Lim successfully won reelection in 2010 over the elder Atienza, defeating his nemesis by over 200,000 votes. He ran under the Liberal Party while Atienza had the blessings of Estrada. Atienza in return endorsed Estrada’s presidential bid. Estrada placed a strong second to eventual winner Benigno Aquino III, garnering over nine million votes.
Last week, I went with a dear friend to a talk entitled "You Shall Believe". Excellent! (Although the timing of the event did nothing for my s-l-o-w transformation into a morning person.)
This poor child needs a good night sleep.. and so do we.. She is so tired, even after a 3 hour nap.. she ended up falling asleep on the kitchen floor.. She laid down to throw a tantrum.. and never even made it to that point.. but fell fast asleep.. Poor little one..
Now, ask any one who follows the press, or any journalist, or editor, to define public interest. Impossible. The term forms the crux of most arguments for or against the tabloid press and their intrusions into taste and privacy.
The individual feels the futility of human desires and aims and the sublimity and marvelous order which reveal themselves both in nature and in the world of thought. Individual existence impresses him as a sort of prison and he wants to experience the universe as a single significant whole. The beginnings of cosmic religious feeling already appear at an early stage of development, in many of the Psalms of David and in some of the Prophets. Buddhism, as we have learned especially from the wonderful writings of Schopenhauer, contains a much stronger element of this.
I like the flavor, a lot, so let's just dump some in. What does that look like, a 2 teaspoons or so?
About 20 thousand voter identity cards from nine villages – Idinthakarai, Thomaiyapuram, Perumanal, Kuduthalai, Vairavikinaru, Kuttapulli, Kuthankulli and Avaidaiyalpuram were collected today and will be surrendered to respective Tahsildars after completing collection at rest villages, according to Pushparayan.
Link up your actual blog post with the blue frog below
But on this particular morning, I’ve got to set aside my natural night owl tendencies and rise with the damn birds. We are on our way down to South Carolina to visit my in-laws – a twelve hour drive we try to make twice a year.
We went to Santorini, the Greek island famous for its sunsets. The island was breathtaking, with dramatic cliffs, whitewashed houses, and a sparkling sea as far as the eye could see.
The cards are 3" x 3" and I used the Designer Frames Embossing Folder to create the embossed oval. The ovals are punched using the Extra Large Oval Punch from Mocha Morning DSP (as everyone probably knows by now - one of my favorite DSP's). The Happy Birthday is stamped and punched using the Word Window Punch, and I added a teeny flower from the Itty Bitty Shapes Punch Pack and a Pearl Basic Jewel. As you can see I also decorated the flaps of my Mini Square envelopes to match.
inviting.
OK, on to the topic at hand. The book won’t get a review as it has already been reviewed before. I know I shouldn’t be re-reading it yet again when I have so many to read but I can’t help it. It is one I really enjoyed and have been recommending to those who like great stories with humor and horror so expertly intermingled that you have to laugh at even the most disconcerting situation the two characters get into.
“Blaise has told me, Gwendydd, that unrest stirs in the land. The Cymry chieftains like your grandsire cannot quell it, and it will come to call here very soon. But these changes, all of them, no matter what they are, must unfold as they are meant to. We may never understand all that happens, but that is our challenge in life. And that includes whatever this vision may portend for me.”
Bambootility.com is a global showcase of bamboo’s versatility. Bambootility.com is a unique platform for multiple bamboo products, research findings, bamboo company directory, media solutions, consulting, business to business supply chain, and e-commerce solutions.
those babbles...
I have never missed the ICFF in New York, a must for architects, designers or anyone for that matter who is passionate for contemporary design. I even showed my Interieurs Collection a few years in a row at the ICFF. This show is not about selling volume, mass market, knock offs, playing it safe. This show is about creative design, going out on a limb and showing the best you've got! I admire the young brave artists who dare to be different.
OpenMarket.org suggested that it's time for Texas' alcohol producers to band together to defend their right to produce and market their products. The wine lobby in Texas is stronger than WBDT. They can sell at the winery, they can have a restaurant and sell to distributors, they are exempt from booth fees at events, and can even sell their wine in dry counties. They use the cudgel of the economic impact of Texas wine tourism, second only to Napa, California's.
Incredible murals that recreate the original inspiring graffiti by the lighting techs in the projection room of The Fox
After the “chat,” all seemed to go well. My son was the Hero who brought restoration to his classmates. Yay, boy! That’s my son. Yeah, he’s a good kid. He’d never do anything like that.
Today I just wanted to give a quick shout out to a book that is now released and in a store near you.....
David Sylvian & Ryuichi Sakamoto - Bamboo Houses
Fresh off his AMAZING show at the Twilight Dance Series on the Santa Monica Pier last month for thousands, Ghana’s Afro Roots sensation, ROCKY DAWUNI joins SLIGHTLY STOOPID’S C-MONEY and special guest MONEY MARK at Key Club on Thursday, September 18 at 9pm!! The show will be followed by an after party at ROCKY’S legendary AFRO FUNKE’ club at Zanzibar!!
“Go confidently in the direction of your dreams. Live the life you imagined” – Henry David Thoreau
tin foil
Leave a link to your blog with the Inlinkz below so that the design team can check out your blog.
Toss in a blender til smooth.
Nawaz, of Flockton Road, East Bowling, Bradford, repeatedly preyed on the 13-year-old, the court heard.
I am looking forward to this. It is good to be on the move, finally.
Viva la Sporks!!
First, philosophy came first; science came later. There is little doubt that without the body of knowledge that was available on logic and reasoning, science wouldn’t have been established.
“In the name of the constitution of Texas, which has been trampled upon, I refuse to take this oath. I love Texas too well to bring civil strife and bloodshed upon her.”
Leave all our hopelessness’s aside (if just for a little while)
What I’d really want to say is I want to say something from my gut. I want to reveal something, but I do not know what to say anymore. I guess my censor is still blocking my thoughts. I want to really express. I want to “open a vein” and really write from the heart. I will. I know I will. I am recovering. I am writing, and I am letting the world see my writing, in all its imperfections, with the hope that I will improve.
meant that garment-sewing for myself was going to be pretty hopeless for a few years (until my size and shape stabilized again...think I'm just about there now) and decided I should try to make a quilt! Now I'm completely hooked.
Thank You. Rest (Lounge even) in Peace, Robert Guskind.
Adoption
Put the remaining milk, heavy cream, sugar, corn syrup and cardamoms in a sauce pan. Bring to a rolling boil on medium high heat, then cook for 4 minutes. Remove from the heat, slowly whisk in the slurry. Return the pan to the heat, stirring with rubber spatula until slightly thickened for one minute. Remove from the heat, discard the cardamoms.
3- Cruise every post from Blogs of War and subscribe to each and every one you find interesting (or don’t already follow).
By Paul Harris, Marketing Director at UKFast
rent” or “paying the bills” – we demand that the BAR stand down and
Unlike the Surrealists, Rauschenberg’s Shirtboards have a sort of crafty animism about them, a mixture between a voodoo fetish box and a handmade birthday card. They match the tone of the sculptures Rauschenberg was making at this time. Evidenced only by photographs, the sculptures appear much closer to Native American dream catchers than they do to anything in going on in the French circles of Paris and New York. The sculptures were hairy, feathery mobiles shifting and swaying in the wind. The Shirtboards continue the spirit of these sculptures.
2. Lately all of my friends are talking about their class reunions. However, I'm not talking about mine. :(
Hidden in the valley between our bodies, nearly concealed by the tangled mess and bright pattern of the quilt, two hands grasp each other tightly – connected by the past, compelled by the present and trying, for now in vain, to bridge the gap of very different futures.
If you do not have sales people, how fast can you hire them? How fast can you train them?
And also, as usual, here's where I get all agitated about being THE ONLY VOTE for a scene that's SO CLEARLY AWESOME! (Actually, this I understand being a solo vote for - I'm probably the only person who saw it, and it doesn't make a lot of sense out of context. But it makes my blood freeze without fail, so here it is.)
78. Then following Chen, January 10, 2012, SM revealed the 5th member, Sehun.
This page was a good one too! Tractors and dogs! What is better than that for 2 country girls!
- Isn't religion the thing you live, the thing that directs, and gives direction?
I have create this delightful digital stamp collection with the garden enthusiast in mine. The collection contains 4 assorted square tiles and one sentiment. This is my most versatile collection I have created to date and it should become a favorite of those that like Cute as well as those that venture a little more towards Arty. This is a mix and match set and the designs can be used individually or all together. You can mix and match them anyway you want and the creative possibilities for this new collection are endless. Since the digital designs can be re-sized with little or no visible loss of quality they will make great focal points for Cards, Scrapbook pages, ATCs, Tag Art, Inchies and so much more...
One miracle at a time (with the exception of the twins!) God gave us eight babies! God has blessed us over and over again in many ways, and it is true that He has restored the years the locust have eaten. We eat in plenty and are satisfied, and we are again praising the name of the Lord our God, who had dealt wondrously with us...He has blessed us with another little one.
"Fashion can be bought, style one must possess". The Essence of Fashion is Style
Dea seems to have mood swings in regards to Math. She hates it, fights about doing it, and complains daily about it. Then, she decides to start creating her own Math dictionary, writing her own Math problems for fun, and doing a second Math program, just for kicks. Then, she's back to despising it. This makes it a rather miserable subject to cover with her.
The work on the bathroom is going slow. Dh had to take apart and re-build an area where the sliding shower door will be. Now it needs re-taped, mudded, and the uber expensive shower sealant painted on. Everything takes longer than you think it will.
Hopefully...very soon...I will be moving to my own domain name as well. Time to get serious on this thing and do something GREAT! :) See ya'll soon!
Milani:
Also you will be able to not only see all of the DT's stunning creations but purchase kits which will include all chipboard pieces and instructions (with a list of papers etc if you want to create exactly the same!)
But anything he wants to do, he can, if he does, as they say, set his mind to it. And now he knows he can follow through on it. This is not Tony Robbins bullshit here, this is E@L learning the hard (and cheaper) way of what great achievements he is capable if he could just shut the fuck up and do them.
This article is still in press, but was published online last month. This study had 34 subjects with Asperger syndrome and 42 nonautistic controls. It appears that while around a quarter of the study subjects with Asperger syndrome in this study have prosopagnosia (as defined by a test score from 2 to 3 SD’s below normal or mean), Asperger syndrome (a type of autism) is also not inconsistent with superior performance on the Cambridge Face Memory Test (CFMT), which is the best test of face recognition that I know of. Some features of the study that perhaps distinguish it from other studies of face recognition in autism are the use of a reliable and valid test of face recognition (Duchaine & Nakayama 2006), the study of face recognition in adults, not children, which is really important because face learning ability appears to be a skill that peaks at a surprisingly late stage in the life-span, into the third decade (Germine, Duchaine & Nakayama 2011), and if autistic people have a delay in development that could potentially affect or bias the results of studies of children and youths.
4) Keep a journal for days when you accomplish something fantastic. Write about your accomplishment and how good you feel. The next time you feel defeated by your inner editor, pull out your accomplishment journal and relive those moments.
Off I went in search of other mobiles that fit the cute/hand-made + functional formula. My first stop was Etsy of course where I was not disappointed.
Panizzi retired from the museum in 1866 after a breakdown in his health, though he continued to take a keen interest in its future developments, including the transfer of the natural history collections to a separate site. He was made a Knight Commander of the Bath in 1869 (arise, Sir Anthony): the year before, he had been created a senator of united Italy (though he never took his seat). His reforms to the museum, his scholarly work, his political activities, and his feuds and arguments, are described in great detail in Fagan’s two-volume biography, published the year after Panizzi’s death in 1879. The work is partisan in the extreme, but it certainly gives a lively portrait of the ‘foreigner’ who transformed the British Museum into the greatest library in the world.
Oh would you send me someone somewhere,
120 g sugar
All sorts of alleys in that area. Yes, I know it's a mess. See the vacuum? I got half done then sort of tired out. Have a mentioned I'm gone twelve hours a day, five days a week.
It is not rare for us to see successive films that deal with similar topics grace our local screens. Be it the possible corporate subterfuge that resulted in the animated films Antz and A Bug's Life being released in the same year or the cultural zeitgeist forming a critical mass of choreographed documentaries about dance like Pina, Joffrey: Mavericks of Dance, and Space in Back of You into Bay Area movie houses this quarter, let alone the So You Think You Can Dance? and Dancing with The Stars TV empires, it's not unusual to find several films in dancing time with the same spirit.
Hello all! This month over at Sunday's with Crissy our challenge is "Beat the Mid-Winter Blues". This challenge can be interpreted many ways - you can think warm and sunny or like I did blue. I love Monochromatic cards.
You have to understand that success just might be……one more second away!
Bag
In navy lace? Even better. And as for the seat belt dress...slap it on me and call me safety conscious. Word on the street (And by street I mean Style.com's review of the show, hurrr. ) is that Sofia Coppola is at least partly responsible for Louis Vuitton's latest resort collection.
My initial impression of the book was more frustration than impressed.
My pooch was abandoned, left to fend on his own and was picked up running the streets of this large city by a shelter. He was severely malnourished and had a horrid case of kennel cough. His time was up and one day last November he was scheduled to be put down. That’s when I received a frantic request to please foster him so that he too could have a chance at life.
The lovely Kindle I received for my birthday last year will help me with this (I need never leave the house without at least 13 books on my person again!), and I'm hoping that by writing personal reviews for each book and posting them here I'll inspire myself a bit more too. (I also have to stop abandoning books before finishing them, something I never used to do but was horribly guilty of last year.)
Eating a meal
The route is a mix of quiet surfaced lanes and rough farm tracks and although most of it is technically quite easy there’s a particular descent from Lower Brushfield farm down to the river that is very technical due to a combination of the rockyness of the track and the steepness of the descent. And yes I did have to get off a couple of times down this section.
Another part оf thе ultra setting would be thе Direct-X compatible sound card thаt has motherboard capabilities іn delivering а high quality sound. These cards аre normally internal or external аnd сan bе attached tо а surround sound system fоr a ultra gaming experience.An active Broadband Internet connection iѕ neсessаrу fоr normal and ultra settings.
“What we encourage officers to do is to determine if the renters were allowing the party,” Oxten said. “The hard thing is if you get into a situation where there is a common area and four people are renting the apartment. If one of them is studying and knows that there is a room full of underage people drinking, they have the ability to step out and say ‘this is my apartment, I don’t want this here.’ Putting yourself in your room and studying can be argued both ways as far as hosting parties are concerned. If you know they’re out there, and your in your room studying, you’re still allowing it.”
Tongue - any small circle next to hole of same - trim end to round
Windows Installer 3.1 or later (prerequisite for installing NET. framework 4.0)
I know they had all been super nervous before the show, but they had fun once they got out on stage. With an audience of about 100 cheering women, the models came out, strutted their stuff, shook their fannies, smiled, tossed their heads. Some had a hard time walking in thigh-high stockings and heels. Some had fat rolls, saggy bits, flawed skin. And no one cared.
And since I am at it, here is the fact sheet about the event:
MCA Public Services and Complaints Department head Datuk Seri Michael Chong became involved with the case during the filming of In Cold Blood.
The History Channel did a special where they investigated the claims made by conspiracy theorists surrounding the events of 911. They then provided a scientific explanation. For example, it was claimed that 911 was an inside job involving a group of people that used explosives to bring the towers down. As evidence they point to video footage of windows seeming to explode before the tower fell.
Thanks to all of you for your comments on yesterday's post. As often as I'm guilty of it, I really do hate to be the bearer of bad news. Having dealt with literary fiction's soft sales as best I can—i.e. by reading some F. Scott and Papa Hemingway while drinking a Bombay Sapphire martini (dry, extra olives)—I'm ready to move on. Historical fiction: how is it selling?
Commando No 4401
Within The Next Couple of Days. X
When Williams asked whether “waterboarding” was one of those techniques, Panetta replied: “That’s correct.”
So thats how i like to color with this color combo. If you own this color combo, my suggestion is to just play with it numerous ways with layering until you find what is comfortable for you!
The visual of the three of them standing all frustrated and out of breath, an Asian, white, and black together, along with the fact that they are chicks kicking this dude's ass and the mystery behind it all is really a great moment in the film, and probably the highlight for me. One can certainly see this type of playfulness and the over-the-top tough chick theme in Tarantino's work.
17. Rubs my feet after a long day
Warm and cosy and super comfortable.
O’REILLY FW, CRAN GW, STEVENS AB. Factors affecting influenza vaccine uptake among health care workers. Occup Med 2005; 55: 474-479.
For my center panel I used the cake stand from Happy Everything and the Create a Cupcake stamp set and matching punch. The flower accent was made with one of the bitty punches and the retired 1/4" circle punch. I thought a rhinestone would look cute in the flower center and then I decided to bling it up more by putting rhinestones on the scallops of the cake stand. The curly label sentiment is from Teeny Tiny Wishes, and for the background I used turquoise, peach and daffodil DPs with tangerine card stock layers and a bit of daffodil taffeta ribbon.
At a sit down spot? Order extra veggies. There's no law saying you have to have a potato with your steamed veggies. Order double veggies instead of the potato. I've done this numberous occasions, and a waiter has never so much as batted an eye at me for doing it.
3 Tbsp. candied ginger, chopped
6. Once it’s doubled in size, sprinkle the dough with flour, flour hands, and cut in two with a sharp knife on a floured board. “Cloak” each loaf by holding in one hand and tucking the overhanging dough to the bottom a few times.
In My Heart’s Vault
Verdict: Loving is a book of its time. The time was the eighties.
Here's a few tips that will help guarantee a successful whatever and help take those anxieties away.
Hiring man says "son if it was up to me"
Coming to the end of The Killing is rather like being suddenly and unexpectedly dumped by a hitherto faultless boyfriend. Like: WHAT THE FUCK WAS THAT ABOUT? WHY HAVE YOU DONE THIS TO ME? I HAVE QUESTIONS! WHAT ABOUT THAT THING YOU SAID LAST WEEK? AND THAT THING YOU SAID THE WEEK BEFORE AND THE WEEK BEFORE AND THE WEEK BEFORE THAT? WAS IT ALL A FRAIL TISSUE OF LIES? DID NONE OF IT MEAN ANYTHING TO YOU? AND WHAT WAS THE POINT OF THAT WHOLE BUSINESS WITH THE COPENHAGEN MAYORAL ELECTION? (My relationships only, possibly.) THIS DOESN'T MAKE ANY SENSE!
But graduation gifts is a difficult niche to publish into---more difficult than adult novelty books.
Did I mention that I'll be buying the next J.D. Kinman novel?
It would lead to different variations on recipes and the editors could add in a bit more tension with “Michael has chosen the black leg chicken imported from Normandy on individual velvet cushions for his Coq au Vin, but has run out of budget for the wine and so is substituting it with Diamond White”.
In a faux commencement address by Woody Allen he wrote “More than at any other time in history, humanity is at a crossroads: one path leads to despair and utter hopelessness; the other, to total extinction. Let us pray we have the wisdom to choose correctly.”
We are modern now. We don’t believe in blessing people, and we certainly don’t discuss cursing them. Jung probably wrote about this somewhere, or perhaps the Italian Freudian, Roberto Assagioli, who wrote about the concept of the will. This lack of belief is the price we are willing to pay for our faith in science and our belief in its priests who reduce life to those things which can be expressed as provable hypotheses. We live inside this religion; thus we may not consider the webs of connections that might exist between and among us all. This notion cannot be proved, therefore it not to be considered, contemplated or discussed, much less researched! Heaven forefend!
“We are using social media to engage broader, more diverse audiences,” said Stephen Kearney, manager, Stamp Services, referring to the initiative that began July 18 with a preview of the Cherry Blossom Centennial Forever stamps. Select stamps from the 2012 commemorative program will be previewed one at a time throughout the summer.
‘‘(A) grant a security clearance on a temporary or permanent basis to an employee or officer of a certified entity;
Thomas Sowell
2009 figures used by the NHS Institute suggest a marked reduction in cost over the preceding decade, putting the cost of a caesarean section at £1415 and the cost of a natural birth at £595. This leaves caesarean sections still almost £1000 more expensive that natural births and it’s not clear whether the Audit Commission “rolled up” the cost of longer in-patient stays for those receiving caesarean sections (which would further increase the differential).
Since I believe in testing products to the fullest before recommending them to readers I’ve stored ammunition as well as a revolver and rifle for the last several months. After placing these items in the bags as recommended I placed them in a damp basement. I occasionally checked on them of course. Two weeks ago I decided it was time to take these items out of storage and inspect them for any signs of rust or degrading of the wood stocked rifle. In the case of the ammunition I also wanted to take this ammunition to the range to make sure all of the rounds would still fire.
And after Brown took over as prime minister in 2007, she met or dined with Brown at least five times, including once at his home.
In the year 1912, nineteen-year-old Christy Huddleston leaves home to teach school in the Smoky Mountains — and comes to know and love the resilient people of the region, with their fierce pride, their dark superstitions, their terrible poverty, and their yearning for beauty and truth. But her faith will be severely challenged by trial and tragedy, by the needs and unique strengths of two remarkable young men, and by a heart torn between true love and unwavering devotion.
up early on Easter Day to allow
I had on a lime green blazer all day, but hauling boxes out to the field had me showing off my flabby old lady arms. Yikes! It's time to do some walking for this gal!
Factor A mouflon? solid
I had a container of Coolwhip in my freezer and didn't know what to do with it. I did some search to find the recipe to utilize it and found this crackle cookies using a cake mix and Coowhip. I gave it a try... It turned out real good. I took them to a beach party one day and they were gone within 5 minutes.
In 1931, the Second Spanish Republic came to power, consisting of a "largely self-appointed group of leaders of several small parties that had been formed within the past
I believe that secret corporate lobbying, like the expenses scandal, goes to the heart of why people are so fed up with politics. It arouses people’s worst fears and suspicions about how our political system works, with money buying power, power fishing for money and a cosy club at the top making decisions in their own interest.
Wild sweet basil is a tropical species that persists in frost-free areas by reseeding heavily. It has no cold tolerance, but has fared well to date in our Pinellas County landscape despite some cold winter temperatures because seed has sprouted from frost-killed plants. It is unlikely, however, to persist in areas where the climate is more harsh.
May 15 - 21 - Rick Bluteau
BJJ Heroes - The brushed-on circle invoking Zen calligraphy, the red bar from the black belt, even the drop shadow. The elements of this design are completely clichéd, yet their execution somehow makes it all work. Like the other designs on this list that incorporate the circle, this logo tries to evoke the idea of the martial artist as one seeking enlightenment. The final chapter of The Book of Five Rings by famous swordsman Miyamoto Musashi is called “the book of the void.” The void is what this circle represents, “By knowing things that exist, you can know that which does not exist.” Those who have understood this principle, like Musashi, are heroes to future generations of martial artists. Our reverence for these individuals is an idea subtly evoked by the BJJ Heroes logo.
I’ve had to break out the canoe to go to the supermarket, and though we’re told the water table is still so low that droughts continue to be inevitable, there are plenty of garden chairs floating about in my garden, thank you very much.
43. Lovable
I guess we all go through this at some stage – somewhere towards the end of the middle of our novels. Knowing that is useful to me: it’s happened before and it will happen again. How do I get out of it? I carry on writing.
"Hey, I got lots more of those," he said eagerly. " Pretty, huh? You want to see more? I found them up in the attic of this place.
“Alright well, we’ll see you down at the station tomorrow morning, appreciate your cooperation” The Detective walks away, then turns back.
The theme is pretty flexible, but I do reserve the right to not accept submissions that really do not fit with the theme (i.e. why public schooling is absolutely necessary), though I don’t really expect to turn down anything, and am really looking forward to seeing what you guys have to share!!
Why are women so hyper critical of other women? some of which they don't know personally? Shouldn't we try to lift other women up? Don't enough men in this world criticize us and put us down, hold us back and keep one foot on the back of our necks enough without our females helping?
drwxrwxr-x 4 root root 96 Oct 11 13:14 VRTSvmpro
Under the Overpass wasn't just a captivating read...it was a challenging read. After all, I couldn't read of experience after experience of Mike and Sam being ignored in church services, being asked to leave church grounds, and being left out of conversations among Christians in a restaurant because of the sight and smell of them without admitting that I very well could have and may have reacted the same way to two homeless men.
MSRP: US$995 Introductory price: US$790.
Answers on a postcard please.
And where there is conformity, there will be a requisite subjugation of personal preference and freedom.
The South Downs of East Sussex rolled by, gently undulating with spring green femininity as we made our way through the former stomping ground of both the late Doreen Valiente and Evan John Jones who once lived close by. We were on a sacred pilgrimage to a place where Roy Bowers (aka Robert Cochrane) and other members of his Clan including Evan John Jones, Doreen Valiente and Bill Gray had once worked a rite together at All Hallows which has since been studied fervently by those wishing to continue Roy’s pioneering work in the early days of The Clan of Tubal Cain. This has been beautifully described by Bill Gray and is now featured in a book documenting Bill’s life and work. (‘The Old Sod’ published by Skylight Press who kindly allowed me to reproduce the passage in Part One)
The IRS Agent's Hymn ........................I Surrender All
Obama's insertion of that acknowledgement of the assistance of Pakistani intelligence into his triumphant announcement of the bin Laden killing further confirms the evidence that Pakistani help in focusing on the Abbottabad compound was crucial, but senior CIA officials, assuming the news media would never catch on, had nevertheless done what officials always do if they don't believe they will be held accountable: they put out false information that made them look good. The lies surrounding the bin Laden killing are one more example of this primary leitmotif of the US national security state in the era of unaccountable permanent war.
The brokenness is in the loss of tension, friend.
Sweep all seven shades over the skin for a soft sunkissed radiance or pick out the individual colours to build definition.
I’m a bit fascinated by Monaco. Well, more specifically, with Princess Grace. I remember when I first saw To Catch a Thief a few years back, I was instantly obsessed with Grace Kelly and her story. Oh, and her clothes. That blue chiffon dress in To Catch a Thief? Yeah, I need one of those.
Today is March 12th 2012 , also know as the Girl Scouts of American founding day by Juliette Gordon Low Savannah Georgia birthplace. This is their 100th birthday. I have been to her house once years ago while visiting Savannah Georgia. I am sure this week in Savannah their is lots of visitors.
Of course, we know from experience not to expect the next album anytime soon, but at least we’ll have another tour before it – provided she keeps her own promise this time. In the meantime, there’s a flat that still needs painting and a few shelves to fit in the kitchen.
A couple of weeks ago, the fine people at Oh! Nuts contacted me to see if I was interested in trying some of their products gratis if I would discuss my experience on this blog. To which I responded: but of course! I was initially tempted to request hordes of walnuts and pistachios – I keep them in my desk drawer and munch on them whenever I’m snackish at work – but that seemed disingenuous. I bake with them from time to time, but that’s not really why I would have wanted them.
This whole past week was eventful. The first political party to form during King’s Abdullah’s reign, the Islamic Umma Party, has been arrested. According to the party’s released statement, they were informed that they would not be released until they sign a document promising that they will abandon all political aspirations.
which means getting approval from a government committee ( or, in Boston,
FOR THE FILLING
As for that McCollumm guy with the earrings and tattoos, well, that boy has smoked way too much crack, or is getting a thril on pulling everyone’s leg. But who knows, he probably has a book or film script all about it.
Thank you Andrea!
I’ve been tagged again, but there won’t be 11 questions this time around, (I’m probably out of answers by now, anyway!). Many thanks to Traci Kenworth for thinking of me for the Lucky Seven Meme. I’ve never seen this game, so it was twice as fun to be tagged for the challenge.
Voting ends today at midnight for the Independent Book Blogger Awards on Goodreads. The winners in each category win a trip to New York City for Book Expo conference. I have never attended this conference and would love to go for the first time. It would be a dream come true.
I did stay with another family for a few months when I was about seven and that experience was similar to Carley’s in that it gave me a peek into a kind of life I had not known previously. Even at that young age, it shifted my view of my own life and what it could hold—if I took charge of my own future. For years after, when I came to a crossroads I tended to make decisions based on that long-term plan. It kept me out of trouble.
It is not exactly the same as turning on CNN to see the news minute by minute.
1 brakeman
After rallies and meetings all day Monday in Sanford, Florida, where the shooting occurred, Trayvon’s parents are expected to appear on Capitol Hill Tuesday as the US Congress takes up the issue of racial profiling.
So that’s all I’ll say about The God of Small Things. I’m happy with my first set of books, though. In the immortal words of Meatloaf, two out of three ain’t bad.
The alabaster stillness,
Today we still teach children how to hold a pencil and form letters properly but we also teach them how to use a keyboard. In fact, state standards require children to publish their writing using digital technology. Less importance is placed upon handwriting - the days of the artistry of quill and ink are gone forever.
Somehow – despite the rare skill of expertly hanging out THREE ENTIRE LOADS of washing inside a small apartment, cleaning the coffee machine, walking the dog, eating Sunday’s leftovers, going for a run to nowhere, chatting in broken French to the Fratman, taking the wine bottles to the public recycling bins and trying to ignore the disapproving stare of the old lady with just three tins to contribute; sneaking in an old episode of Antiques Roadshow, chasing up an old medical account with an insurer who only answers phones between 9-12 on weekdays and even then has an answering machine that says, ‘Our lines are busy. Please try again later,’ and fishing out 52 retro French magazines from the papier skip before photographing and putting them up for sale on ebay – I do manage to do all of my freelance writing gigs on time.
Some parents—and doctors—fear that vaccinated children are protected against specific infections, but that their immune systems reacts less to non-specific diseases and that vaccinated children contract infections such as colds, bronchitis, or gastrointestinal infections more often than unvaccinated children. However, the KiGGS data did not show any notable differences in the numbers of infections.
6. Leaf Hound 'Freelance Fiend'
Although 2011 was filled with struggle and strife, it was also an abundant year filled with spiritual lessons, forgiveness, growth and love. Our family is strong and together. My marriage is thriving and our children are growing. There truly is no where else that I would rather be. Our 2012 is filled with anticipation at the adventure that is waiting for us. We're looking forward to a move in the Summer. Knowing that God is in control of all aspects of our lives has brought me so much peace. No matter what, come what may, we will make it!
Another definition of “organic” is “forming an integral element of a whole.” That’s another thing our roleplaying does: it helps each participant to form an integral element of the whole composition of our guild. By supplying one vital part of the guild’s story, each character – with their backstory, their present roleplaying interactions, and their plans for their character’s future – contributes to the guild’s story. Our guild’s roleplaying “theme” or “storyline” is comprised of the interconnected, interwoven storylines that are being dynamically played out by all of the roleplaying characters in the guild. Generally, one could accurately say that we are a guild of “adventurers, tradesmen, merchants, and patriots of the Alliance,” and that is extremely broad by design. We want to appeal to, tolerate, and include as diverse a mix of characters as possible, without introducing incompatible characters to our organizational ecosystem.
Sony Ericsson’s design already fits in with Sony’s style, and we probably won’t see that changing too much. We may see Xperia devices with much better specs, though. If the new smartphones are going to be powerful gaming devices, the specs will have to be much more impressive.
Well, I faffed about this morning and I think it's worked.
And this is just one more milestone - granted, it's a big one. The biggest yet. But it's only of small relief to pass it, because we are still four weeks (as of today) from viability. We need more time yet, and I feel wild for it to be here already. The thoughts swirl darkly in the back of my mind that we will pass this weekend - after all, why shouldn't we? - and get to 21 or 22 or 23 weeks only to have something go wrong before that salvation of a day at 24 weeks. And won't that taste be bitter in my mouth?
“Earlier generations could aspire to do great things, but your generation and those being born as I speak, can only aspire to pay off your portion of the national debt. You are graduating into a nation whose debt actually exceeds its annual Gross Domestic Product. Now that’s historic!”
Bennett: Thank you so much for the interview and support of the music! And thank all of you for listening!!
It was cold, there were very aggressive mosquitoes, it was full of Brits and the food wasn't up to much.
Most folks, with whom I occasionally socialize when I get the urge, think that Cain’s story is just another ancient myth, -- another old legend that has no bearing on current events. As soon as I tell these folk that it does have a bearing on current events happening right under our very noses, and that Cain was in fact a real-live historical figure, whose super-human satanic influence on humanity changed the world, I’m usually greeted with an attitude of complete apathy. I end up keeping my mouth shut, while the subject nimbly changes to the Blue Bull’s latest victory, or some other boring sports-topic.
Save for the future.
horde ( thank you, Sigmund) .. Keep reading the books and the runes, Lord L
Substitutes: Ross Turnbull, Ashley Cole, Michael Essien, Frank Lampard, Juan Mata, Salomon Kalou, Didier Drogba
Because, unlike Mr. Liptak, I’m not getting paid for looking for dirty words in judicial decisions, I am unable, for now at least, to push my inquiry any further. But for those interested in the subject, there is an article by Christopher M. Fairman, whom Mr. Liptak describes as the “leading authority on the legal status of the word” in the United States, pithily entitled “Fuck”.
A lot crammed in there, more than I would've suspected would have fit in a single issue of Ms. Marvel. The story also features a closing recap of what would happen to Carol, up to becoming Binary, which was a cool look but a worse name than Warbird. I prefer her keeping "Ms. Marvel," as a tribute to Captain Marvel...but Carol getting promoted doesn't sound bad either.
LinkedIn last November launched the next version of their profile pages so professional can include a host of content that is keyword driven for search and falls within specific categories.
So what CAN you do to prevent stress or alleviate it once it’s happened? Firstly, you need to recognize the symptoms of stress which sometimes can be very subtle.
in auditoriums. A shortly lived metamorphosis.
A stained glass window inches deep in cobwebs that I’d spotted on holiday in North Devon found its way into Disaster Bay; the nursery rhyme Oranges and Lemons provided one of my favourite scenes in Cry Danger; an abandoned canal boat formed the basis for Fishing for Clues and a skull I spotted in a little Scottish museum was the trigger for my Beast trilogy.
Well, I have. It’s not good.
Success of sorts tonight.
Probably one of the best is where he describes consciousness as the CEO of a large company, a large company of zombies actually:
“As you can see, there are a
Anyways, HA! In yo' face AGAIN Megs. I blogged. AGAIN. Need I say it more? AGAIN.
Greek Taverna is owned by a guy named Peter, who also owns a few of the IHOP’s in the local area. Greek Taverna is his dream restaurant, and he spared no expense in its construction and decoration. Here we’re looking at his wine cellar, which has real medieval-age doors from a castle in Europe — they are not reproductions. The cellar itself is made out of ceramic, which requires no temperature control.
5. Tie twine to the top of card and add beads.
As I have made three versions of view A and one of view E, the tank top, all ready I definitely see making a few more in the future.
Well, camera phone has come a long way from its first inception. I don’t bring along the big camera today as it was too misty and very unlikely to get good pictures. But the camera phone is light and convenient. In some ways I think the pictures are better taken than the ones taken with the other camera.
I left the best part for last, because it’s something I noticed right away and here is why. With every new vaccine, drug or medical treatment; there is always a cost analysis to determine if it is viable to put to market. If a procedure costs more than it would profit, it is usually shelved. Vaccines are always checked to make sure that it is profitable and marketable. I saw this very early on when I started learning to read studies, so I noticed right away that there was some noting at the bottom of the bill, stating that any costs could be deferred and it got me thinking about how this bill could possibly be profitable. It didn’t take long of course, to see where the money was going to go and yes this bill will be making people money. Think about it.
But what really surprises me about Nodder's article is the section where she says:
Some of the runs that I do might sound a little crazy. The 100-milers are a case in point. Running 100 miles within 20 to 30 hours might seem like a delusional dirge-like death march of a run...but actually it's more of a spiritual journey for me. It is my church. It's how I stay centered in this nutty existence.
What I am most excited about is to feel more like an "adult". I haven't lived in an actual house in over 8 years. I have been an apartment girl! The past 2 being in a townhouse, but lets face it..its the same! I am excited to have a big garage, a yard...I might even plant some flowers?! who knew?! What I am super excited about is to have my own "room". Josh is being very supportive of my makeup career, so I am going to turn our extra bedroom into a makeup room. I can do bridal consultations at the house which is super exciting for me! My own GIRL space! I feel so bad for him now. Our bathroom looks like a cosmetic counter threw up in it. So now, he won't have to see any makeup at all! I am going to put it all in my room ;) I already have several brides booked for the year and am hoping to build my business. I know I am talented and blessed, so fingers crossed that I can make this happen!
If you are interested in further information and insights on the processes, continue reading…
They even use it under their small lawn near the house. If you poke your finger at the grass roots you can feel the gravel base which helps the lawn hold up beautifully to lots of foot traffic.
Mobsters
The reason I have it is because I managed to win a prize of 4 assorted beers from a raffle draw on the recent Nagano Trading December to Remember beer party.
04.Consume Of Sorrow Defiled (03:27)
Madhu Pandit Das then set about addressing the issue of supporting education through a mid day meal scheme. He worked at leveraging technology and philanthropy towards the cause of alleviating hunger of school children of this country. Thus was born the Akshaya Patra Program. It began as a scheme that fed 1,500 underprivileged children in the year 2000. In less than 10 years the Akshaya Patra Foundation has becomes one of India’s best conceived, technology-intensive social sector initiatives. A strategic intervention in the education of underprivileged children that provides unlimited, free, hygienic, nutritious meals every day. This programme reaches over a million school children in eighteen locations in eight states in the country. The growth of Akshaya Patra Foundation demonstrates Madhu Pandit Dasa’s organizational ability in bringing together the best technology and innovation-talents , principles and practices of corporate governance, corporate donors, individual donors and the government into the social sector to address, in a scalable manner, one of the most pressing needs of the country, that of supporting education among underprivileged children.
Just realized yesterday I have 300 followers already. Even though I'm super lazy in blogging this year, you gals still stay with me. It had been some time since I organized a giveaway so here is what i put together for you:
Hello? Are you out there?
you tag know they've been tagged.
Can we turn this into a for the record post? Mkay.
How You Can Save on Remote Control (RC) Toys
Assemblymember 57th A.D. Hakeem Jeffries
Purely to impress us with his grasp on the concept, he started to take a bite of food and proudly added, “Church is about the people you are with, not where you are.”
SO, I talked to the director and she was so great to us. She promised to not fill the kids' spots until I found out for sure about the job. I had already decided to that the kids and I would be heading to Florida the next week to see my parents (because the kids were not going to be in school anymore anyway), so we kept those plans. Friday came and went and I didn't hear anything, so I talked with the daycare director again and we agreed that the kids would use their "vacation week" the next week so we wouldn't have to pay and she would still hold our spots.
They were Eddie, Eve and Joan, and Phyllis who I think was the youngest. They met for the first time as they were being inducted into the ATS. They came from a variety of backgrounds: Eve, for instance, had been a dancer in a West End musical, while Phyllis was your ‘Cockney sparrow’ leaving home for the very first time, and loving it. There’s a photograph of them somewhere, wearing gym kit, looking happy and healthy and bright.
“Frankincense and Myrrh resin. Do you have those?”
Well, Brady will be 3 months old on Wednesday. He is getting so big. At his last appointment, he weighed in at 10 pounds, 13 ounces and 23 inches long. He started to really open his hands and grab on to toys this past week. He smiles all the time, and really recognizes mommy and daddy. It is so much fun being a mommy. I worry a lot though about him, which I am assuming is normal. He breathes funny and I freak out...if he doesnt eat all of his bottle I freak out! I am learning to adjust and realize that some of these things are normal. Sometimes he hates being cradled, and it makes me scared becuause in my mind, babies should like to be held in the cradle position. So, I do a lot of worrying!
Hope you all had a wonderful Easter!
“Hmmm.” She was silent for what seemed like eternity and then she quietly asked him, “Do you trust me Arham?”
1-14-12
Will I pay to have my lovely wallpaper put up....only to be able to spot lines underneath.....or worse yet, bubbles? If I end up stripping the top part of the wall, I will have effectively stripped every surface in the entire kitchen, with the exception of the sink. Oy.
Kira shook her head. “You’re not understanding me. I’m not asking your permission, Ryan. I’m not taking orders. I’m not one of your men that you can just order around. I’m your sister and I'm not a child. This,” she gestured behind her, “is what I want, and it’s what I intend to have, with or without your blessing.”
Sundlaugin
This passage illustrates one of the key purposes for Jesus' life on earth, to be a human example of how God wants us to live. Jesus said, "Do as I do." The most incredible part of this command is that it comes with an offer of the power to live it out. Jesus doesn't just ask us to try to live like the Son of God out of our own strength - His resurrection gave us access to His strength. Today, meditate on the example Christ left for us. What does washing feet look like in your own relationships and circumstances? How can you serve others in this most basic way like Jesus did for His friends?
One year at holiday time I "elfed" Marcel online (www.elfyourself.com). We laughed so hard I thought one or both of us might actually keel over.
“Stein’s closest friend, and a man who greatly influenced her turn toward fascism was Bernard Fay, who the Vichy government put in charge of hunting down Masons, Jews and other perceived enemies of the State. Fay was more than a mere collaborator as suggested by the Met exhibit. He was a full blown Nazi operative, responsible for the deaths of many people. After the war, when the horrendous results were known to all, Gertrude wrote in support of Fay when he was placed on trial for his Nazi war crimes.”
Q: How do I get Stirred?
I have a full week ahead of me, but I have nothing scheduled tomorrow afternoon. I am going to come home from my morning meeting and sit on the deck and sip lemonade and tea. I am taking the dog for a long hike, then I am going to take a nap. Those are the three things I am putting on my schedule for Tuesday afternoon. I love that I have a lot of creative juice and hope and vision for the present as well as the future, but I need to start setting aside some days where I just count rain drops, while the day stretches out lazily before me in an unending reverie of slow.
If you stopped by this blog looking for answers about whether it is possible to be spiritual/religious/whole if you are transgendered, I want to assure you that it is. I don’t really have the right words myself, but I’d like to borrow from Max Ehrmann’s “Desiderata”
you’re the prettiest for me
Answer is: middle-of-the road (b). Waterproof enough, not the warmest, but I'll stop at the basement of BHV and get shearling slip-in soles to keep my tootsies insulated from the French chill.
It's moments like this when I contemplate home-schooling again, but it's not the right decision for us, it'd be a selfish decision on my part. Instead I'll just make the most of all the time I do have with Rachel, which is more than most mums who have to work full time.
Company Deals in: Musical Instruments
Here’s another one. I have a leadership friend who loves to measure results. I don’t want to measure results. Just keep pushing toward more. He frustrates me by asking, “What are you going to measure?” Grrr!
Remember to post your projects using Inlinkz no later than 12:00 noon Central time on Friday, July 29, 2011. We will announce the winner of the stamp set and the new Top Mouse Award winners when the new sketch challenge is posted on Saturday, July 30. Please use a direct link to your project and feel free to enter as many times as you like!
is even shittier
Whatever my dark imaginings may have been at that time, it was twenty-five years before I was able to do anything about them, aside from one sloppy kiss that L doesn’t even remember, that I managed to snag from her in about 1987 when I drove her home from a party.
Cuttlebug round shaped cut out silver card and holographic paper.
Police and forensic teams fell on the place. They already knew the identity of the victim – someone had scrawled her name on a huge placard, which they had left beside the decaying body. Scabbed wounds peppered Naomi Allen’s corpse; little drops of blackened blood darkened where the pins had penetrated, before being removed and scattered on the ground around her. Below her eyes, more red had been smudged downwards and around her cheeks in a burlesque blush. Naomi might even have witnessed this, had her eyeballs not been savagely, yet clinically removed.
Thanks again to everyone who came by our table and said hello!
I’ve been really good this year. I watched every meet that was available on television – indoor, elite, college and high school. I watched a ton of meets online (thanks for increasing the free feeds this year). I supported my local high school team, and I got finish line seats at every meet I went to. And I made sure to watch and cheer for every event at every meet – track and field.
Such a teenage thing to have bugger all to do,
So anyway, this week we got a washer and dryer.
Meanwhile, Share-a-Bike is a wonderful program begun in 1994 that refurbishes used bike and donates them to the homeless, new immigrants, and the underprivileged here in Greater Lansing. The need for donated bicycles is definitely there. As Dick Janson explained to me, more than 600 bicycles have been given to those in need in each of the past three years and many more could have been if there had been more donations.
Apparently, here is who is responsible, and the trick they used to quietly slip in these provisions:
Cold War Kids – Sensitive Kid; Broken Open
Last Saturday in the teeth of the worst blizzard I've ever seen in North London, I ventured out to meet my daughter in Camden Town. By the time I arrived ice crystals were falling out of the sky. Camden Lock right in the heart of the famous Stables Market was covered in snow and the water was beginning to freeze in the canal.
You can store the leftover vanilla bean in a jar with sugar, to make vanilla sugar.
Also useful is recycling your as-yet unprinted interview answers.
dress: H&M, coat: Sugarlips, belt & purse: thrifted, boots: Charlotte Russe
In 1565, Cosimo I asked architect Vasari to build a corridor to connect Palazzo Vecchio to Palazzo Pitti, crossing the Uffizzi. This was to be the wedding gift for his son Francesco. The corridor, known as Corridoio Vasariano, is one kilometer long and it crosses right over Ponte Vecchio, where it sits on top of the goldsmiths’ shops.
Less-developed Asian countries showed some improvement from the 2010 index, but probably not as much as governments would like. Indonesia’s well known logistics bottlenecks place it 59th overall in the world. That’s better than the 75th place showing two years ago, but even lower than where it was in 2007 when it ranked 43rd. All that bouncing around still leaves it decidedly in mediocre territory.
1. Bring solutions.
... I'm so happy today.
My prejudice on Coolwhip have changed until one day I tried these cookies a couple of years ago.
Hello and Good Evening....Now i usually post this on a Friday Morning but thought i may as well let it go live after i finish writing it so here it is The winners post!
I'm watching that movie, Sisterhood of the Traveling Pants. When the little girl dies in the end, makes me sad. SAD.
While it may seem odd that an introverted function would characterize a species, it makes more sense once we reconsider the discussion in the last post. The community itself can become one of the primary pressures on evolution and Introverted Sensation provides a key advantage in adapting to the community.
Next was the "Lolligagger" which is a Chocolate cake with a cookie dough center topped with a foul looking lime green buttercream, with glittery sprinkles all over it. Besides that it looked like a Care Bear pooped it out and was so artificial looking, I was excited to have a cookie inside a cupcake! But no, the excitement only lasted one bite. The cookie dough tasted like old plastic, and the rest was so sugary I couldn't stand to have another bite. And may I add, Frosting overload?!?! Seriously!
World Tribunal on Iraq – Arab session
She frowned and said,
Is this the future of publishing?
On the other hand, in California, I stayed at a house with 6 people and only 2 had jobs. One man was in his later 30′s, the other worked from home as a marketing specialist. The rest of the house was either unemployed, or going to school with no clear idea if what they are studying is what they really want to do, in essence, getting a skill and hoping it works out. But everyone at that house is happy, they all are stress free, they all seem to be OK with where they are in life, even though they have no career path or prospects at this moment.
96. In what sort of dwelling do you reside? - A single family home, which we have made into a two-family set-up. My mom and gram live on the main floor, my husband and I live downstairs, each with our own entrance.
Nahanni National Park
In this program we heal take your photography to the next level as we look at exclusive specialized areas of capturing stunning images. See step ~ means of step how to paint a night scene with light on a 20 fine exposure. Learn the skills of moving with models and using flash and reflectors in the light of ~. Watch as Karl gives you his vertex tips for action shots and gives you each insight into essential pro equipment on the side of Macro, Remote Capture and much, plenteous more. Course outline on next boy-servant .
Beth's tending bar at a wedding when she comes face-to-face with a tuxedo-clad man she never thought she'd see again. She tries to keep her distance from Kevin but, by last call, she can't say no to his too-blue eyes or the invitation back to his room. Then she slips out before breakfast without leaving a note and, despite their precautions, pregnant.
Class: Magnoliopsida
Here are some photos taken on my adventures. In order: Casablanca (Morocco Mall and Hassan II Mosque), Essaouira, Taghazout (plus drive to the waterfalls through Paradise Valley), Agadir, and Marrakech.
I still notice beautiful women, though now, often it’s a shapely lady with grey hair walking down the street who can turn my head. My step-son observed such a diverting glance one time and admonished: “Bob, you are a married man!” I replied, “Jesse, it’s when I STOP looking at beautiful woman that your mom needs to start worrying.”
2…network.
If we look at answers to the question of what is the most important issue facing Britain today we see that there are some differences between the majority and minority:
Brush a thin layer of mustard over the bottom of the tart dough, or spread on using the back of a teaspoon. Add tomato and onion mixture to the tart.
Bonus - Refer a winner and receive $500 to spend on anything on the site, which is 6 more chances to win!
The cruel irony here is that 60 years ago, the life insurance industry was on the forefront of technology. By being the first major industry to embrace computer technology into its business systems, the industry was considered ahead of the times. The use of technology allowed the insurance industry to significantly improve productivity and reduce costs. It launched a period of exceptional growth and profitability. That was yesterday.
AA- Asian dad thinks it’s not bad, but you could do better.
At first Brad's all "WHAT?!" but then he laughs and says "it's fine! It's liver!" Then Ramoner shrugs, takes a bite (of the one she just let her dog lick on) and says, "it's good." I LOVE IT when she brings the crazy like that.
Ronan and Cleo are completely stunned, and only Ronan is able to mutter out “Uhh… What?”.
Posted by Ann Barnhardt - October 18, AD 2011 7:10 PM MST
salt & pepper
1, 2, 4, 5 U.S.A or Canada
I love it in my car so much.
I wondered that she is so adorable~~~
I have fallen madly in love with The Wanted over the past month or so. I have their songs as ringtones on my phone and listen to them kind of incessantly here lately. I absolutely love this song, their second US single, a new track from their debut US EP, “The Wanted EP,” so it was actually new to me, as opposed to most of their other music which had been around a while without having been released in the US. This song is absolutely gorgeous! I love it’s dance sound and it’s “Oh oh oh oh oh” melody, which is an element that is being majorly overused in music lately, since Britney and Jennifer Lopez both did it on singles released within days of each other. Still, it is put to very good use on this song. Like I said, I absolutely love this song and if you enjoyed their first US single, “Glad You Came,” then you will definitely love “Chasing The Sun,” as well! This song is definitely worth a download!
CC goes on 2nd shift next week. Which is our dreaded shift during the school year. (2 pm-10 pm) We had really hoped that we would get this shift out of the way during the summer, which would have been nice. But, once I get back to school (in a week and a half...) we will only get to see each other in bed. Luckily his days off are during the week so we'll get to see each other then, but it's just not the ideal shift for us. I'll do my best to adjust! It's only going to be 4 weeks! (Hopefully!)
Therefore most gladly I will rather boast in my weaknesses,
Look forward to it – or face my wrath!
Books on Weather Phenomena and Forecasting
The buzz: "It's irritating, it's whiney, it's bloody annoying, to be quite honest. But honesty is the intention."
tiny meatballs, spinach and pasta. It was so good. I have also had artichoke &
In 2012 came BBC’s answer to the X Factor in the shape of The Voice. Although the format of the show is basically the same there is one difference. The auditions are blind. The judges – Jessie J, Will.i.am, Tom Jones and Danny O’Donoghue – sit with their backs facing the auditionee. When it first aired it seemed as if there was finally a show that didn’t base their singing talent on how they look. However, it seems like the show is slowly becoming more and more like X Factor. The sob stories are starting to surface and also there seems to be quite a few good looking contestants on the show. One story that has been in the paper a lot recently is the story that one of the contestants Bo Bruce is estranged from her aristocrat father. Why does it matter about her family life? Thought the show was about her voice not if she has a relationship with her father or not. You can’t set up a show up to be completely different to X Factor then borrow one of the most well known devices.
I was a paperboy from third grade until I entered ninth grade, from ten years old to fifteen years old. Believe it or not the main reason I quit the paperboy job was that I thought I was too big to ride a bicycle. Remember, back in the Fifties only kids rode bicycles.
and won''t have nothing to worry about
For the colors, typically, the dress for flower girl will either be in the same shade of white or ivory as the wedding dress, or it will be in the color that the bridesmaids are wearing. If you prefer to the idea of the white dress, add a sash in the same hue of the bridesmaid dresses to tie your bridal party together. However, the all-white dresses are the most formal, and they may have some details that similar to the embellishments found on the bridal gown, like lace, embroideries, etc.
Useful site:
2.Roosevelt Graves And Brother / Woke Up This Morning
of a taser to compel the prisoner to surrender a DNA sample was “excessive force.” At the time, Smith “posed no immediate threat to the safety of himself or officers, nor did he attempt to evade the officers by flight,” recounts the decision. Smith “was handcuffed, seated on the floor, and surrounded by three
Happy Birthday my little one.
I remember watching the second overtime and wondering how the players would ever muster up the energy to push the puck into one of the nets. It seemed like everyone was gassed at that point except for the goalies. Fortunately, the fourth intermission gave both teams a second (or third, or fourth) wind, and the pace picked back up in the third OT.
What I’m looking forward to: Christmas!
I'm not going to go "there" yet....but if I hear some of the wrong names in a possible trade, I'm going to flip.
What happens when T tries to make a match for A? Somebody ends up in prison. Read on to find out who …
It was too late to save her, when she was found.
Hugs to everyone!!
"There was no other way," Jill replied before I could finish. Her eyes were filled with compassion, and she clearly had an understanding of things far beyond what I could comprehend. "I know you can't understand that now, and I can't explain it, but you have to trust me. There was no other way."
Her constant asking to "G G Go out-side"
Unless bankers want the peasants storming their Winter Palaces, is it not prudent to be seen to curb their appetites?
I have scored the music for a couple of movies. "The Amazing Truth About Queen Raquela" and "Stóra Planið" (“Higher Force”. I am recording a new record at the moment and am hoping to be able to release in sometime in mid-2009.
"How can good new writers be published when the industry is ruled by people who aren't interested in originality?"
If any person arrived at the age of discretion profanely curse or swear or get drunk in public, he shall be fined by a justice one dollar for each offense. Ok, to me, this means that you can only get fined $1 if you get drunk in public. Why aren’t more people drinking at public events? This is very disappointing. Every street party now can be a drunken affair. Just hand a cop a $1 and party away.
I have mentioned before that I learn more about the real world by wandering around paying attention to what is going on around this 4 acre property than I have up until now in my life. I was throwing out my tuna/carrot/lardy goodness cakes (to keep me getting spammed by the Chinese-New Zealanders about just who invented pikelets/fritters…) to the waiting throng of chooks, sparrows and feral cats below whilst passing morsels sideways to the waiting dogs, when I started to notice interesting societal things about our little ecosystem we call Serendipity Farm. The cats have had to learn to get along with the chooks because it became pretty obvious that if you stalk a chook you get a piece of wood thrown at you. Not only do the cats not attack the chooks (apart from the odd fluff ball that doesn’t stay close to mum and who disappears “somewhere” in the ether) but they are actively afraid of them! This is NOT normal. Chooks are supposed to be afraid of cats but on Serendipity Farm where nature gazes from below up at a benefactor with attitude they learned pretty soon that the cats were not going to mess with them and have turned from terrified cat snacks into bullies who will steal food from the cats mouths. How out of whack are we?! From the very first group of 8 point of lay chooks that we bought last year and that chased a terrified Felix down the pathway in blatant avian angst our chooks have attained a level of induced fear that would rival a biker gang in human terminology. They strut…they peck…even Pingu runs into the throng of cats and delivers savage blows to the top of their hissing heads should they dare to even LOOK at her. Our chooks are more dangerous than our dogs! Forget Bezial and Earl any burglars out there… you would be sneaking into the danger zone the moment you stepped onto the property. Be afraid… be VERY afraid!
There is no wisdom, no insight, no plan that can succeed against the LORD. Proverbs 21:30
To make a hologram, the object to be photographed is first bathed in light of a laser beam. A second laser beam is bounced off the reflected light of the first and the resulting interference pattern where the two laser beams commingle is captured on film.
Hello my lovely bloggers! I can't believe it's been so long since
KT: You mentioned in your speech that major newspapers in USA and UK are biased against books written by women, often overlooking them in favour of books written by men. Do you think this reflects a general bias against women writers?
I saw some modern agony, not picturesque at all.
Church and Brambleton. Church and Brambleton. Church and Brambleton.
(A little "me history": I grew up spending summers in PEI with my family. I haven't been back in six years, but thought it was high time Michael get a taste of the Island charm!)
EK-Success 1 inch scallop circle punch
This week I'm sharing my candles that I had lit last night. Usually this time of the year the weather starts warming up a bit but not this year! We are now getting the cold, wet weather we didn't get all winter! If I had a fireplace I would have it lit but since I live in an old apartment with no fireplace, I light my candles when I want it to feel warm and cozy in here. It looks so peaceful and serene but it isn't....
I am reading... My bible and enjoying my new devotional book each morning as I read God's word.As always on a catch up reading my magazines. I have a few cross stitch magazines I have not even opened yet!
One lucky reader can win a copy of The Elemental Journal. For a chance to win, all you need to do is leave a comment on this post by Thursday 3/31. The winner will be on announced on my Facebook page on Friday 4/1. Please be sure I have your email so I can contact the winner directly. Good luck!
From this eddy, the river calms down, but it does keep going. The rapids get longer and
But I'm very happy for her. Freedom! What a glorious thing!
would load and prepare the guns for the king. In preparing one of the guns,
I'm in love!
To pre-order your copy click on the Add to Cart Button (or buy now-not sure why buy now is showing instead of add to cart)
Housework -- 10 - 20 minutes (laundry, put away dishes, change bedding, wipe down bathroom)
Two years and a graduation ceremony later, our newest nurses come out of university into a very uncertain healthcare system, much different to the one they saw applying for the course years ago. These are not only young and free twenty year olds, but often mothers, fathers, homeowners. Add to these commitments another $15,000 in university fees on loan and job security becomes a big deal. Picking up and moving interstate isn’t an easy option, if it is one at all.
“I don’t want to say anything until I know for sure, but let’s just say justice for Elvren’s death has yet to done.”
In summer of ’07 I was working for a private contractor as a trainee electrician. It was a fuckin’ fantastic job cuz all we did was make conversation with the ladies and talk shit to each other… whilst doing our job of course.
Indeed, with snap elections just called for May 6th in Greece and other EU governments in equally untenable positions, it is clear that the EU experiment has already failed and is, in reality, finished. Instead of wasting any more time on it, we should return immediately to national currencies and national sovereignty, as well as a global Glass Steagall policy, a fixed exchange rate system and American credit system economics. This is the road to recovery.
From My Stash:
Whole large green chill, with a small slit made in it
I'll leave you with some music from Gaelic Storm today.
Universal Thrift Club must be given credit for tonight’s gig, as well as Sleep In Music, who more than live up to their claim of supporting and promoting up and coming musicians with talent that stand out from the crowd, and now, with both support bands doing their bit entertain the growing crowd, Fat Cats had filled up pretty much to its capacity as they waited for Camp Stag, the band that without even playing their first gig, already stand out from the crowd. The crowd itself was full of faces from the music scene; Andy Gower, Emilio Pinchi, Moral Panics, The Sport, Dead Format, Sworn To Oath, even half of All The Young had turned up to watch the four lads take the local music scene by the scruff of the neck. Opening with Matilda Please, a song already featured on WrongPops charity album, Camp Stag immediately tell Stoke-on-Trent they have arrived. And these guys mean business. Rich Dooley proves that music really is in the genes with his seamless, unique drum patterns, and Ade Harrison’s keyboard skills are already becoming a trademark sound for Camp Stag, with just the introduction of current single Sirens causing a stir in the crowd, as this eagerly anticipated band finally unleash the song everyone was waiting for. Dan Nixon produced an eerie, pulsating performance on guitar and vocals, with the crowd hanging on every word he said, whilst Chris Wilson brought great energy to the stage with his well thought out bass play.
A couple of weeks ago, locking up late at night, I saw a stoat by moonlight, out at the back in the walled garden. He was wearing his winter coat, which is why I saw him, it almost gleamed in the clear night, and took me quite by surprise. I told the boys in the morning, but I think they thought I'd dreamt it, until, a few days later Rick spotted him and grabbed the camera (usual garden detritus, it's winter, I'll sort it in spring); listen to Rick's awe, he was completely alone:
I woke up this morning in contemplation of many things but one that is probably on your mind as well, is the state of Blogger. How could they? What were they thinking? Was it really necessary? Will it happen again? Our work..our thoughts, our photos...our wellbeing, all poured into these little boxes called 'New Posts'. I had to think outside the square (rectangle), literally and think of another solution.
This little sweet bird is also still on my table, even though the necklace is finished and posted to Etsy. She's not quite ready to go into my stash of product...doesn't seem like she should be shut in a box -
For better and for worse, the other tracks reflect what the two musicians know how to do best. Season's Reverse deconstructs funk, soul and jazz (and maybe even gives a glimpse of a more "popular" side of Grubbs' music). The instrumental Black Horse deconstucts folk dances, western soundtracks, and salsa, and ends with a three-minute guitar duet that updates John Fahey to post-rock. Fahey is the main inspiration behind Bauchredner, a seven-minute guitar dream that surprisingly closes with a triumphant trumpet-driven theme.
Slop, mess an all that goodness…
- Turning around their lowest-performing schools.
The regret that Dan claims to hear the most is “Taking too long to fire a poor performer.” I don’t think firing employees comes naturally to anyone—except perhaps Donald Trump. Many new leaders avoid making this tough call. But keeping a poor performer on staff is detrimental to your bottom line as well as your team’s productivity and morale.
CrazyAxMurderer: I'm going as Hootie and the Blow Job.
Viv wasn't just a bag; she was a stylish keeper of secrets – receipts, schedules, make-up and stealth purchases all dutifully zipped from the public eye. She once even harboured an iron – but that’s another story.
01 - Devilish Hurry
1 1/2 C quick cooking rolled oats
The “visioning process” took six months to complete, and the wording of it required major revision, discussion, and fine-tuning. Nevertheless, the importance of establishing the “vision” lay as much in the process undertaken as in the end result, and by bringing together all the co-riparians (except for Eritrea which, at the time, remained an observer) raised important discussion on key legal and development issues.
Turns out, our chaplain didn't look at the documents before throwing them in an envelope and mailing them in to the courthouse. So, you know, the one thing she was supposed to do didn't get done. -_-
We also met Drifter, the beaver. Drifter is also rescued and lives at Science North as he is missing part of his tail and is unable to live in the wild. He has a big area to swim in and was sleeping happily in his habitat when we visited him. What a cutie!
I have not quite figured out how to upload documents onto my blog, so I usually just put things onto my class website and then link that to the blog-but I won't be able to do this until tomorrow because I am off to go visit my parents and celebrate my dad's 60th birthday!!! But I will definitely add to this post with a visual tomorrow so that if you want to print and use with your kiddos you can.
My Great-Grandfather, Samuel Berger emigrated to San Francisco in 1904 from Bucharest, Romania, where he learned his trade as a second generation wood carver. I was fortunate enough to have known him; he died in 1970 when I was ten years old. He was the sweetest, most humble man.
For example, here is a testimonial I received from a client who is an artist:
Here is the full post I put together explaining what I think is going on with frequency / weather modification:
This is in reference to my last post. The Fleet Foxes record came out this summer, and after I heard it I purposefully waited until September to buy it, since I knew it would be a better soundtrack for the fall than the summer.
Like hummus. And pita. And carrot sticks. Altogether of course. ‘Nuf said.
Unhappiness about the direction of New Labour surfaced again yesterday in reports that key shadow ministers, like Robin Cook and David Blunkett, have attended meetings at the Commons of a group called What’s Left. All they were doing, they said last night, was explaining party policy to sceptics.
Strap on the chute and get on the plane, big guy. I’ll be happy to be the jumpmaster who puts a boot up your ass as you and your bullion exit over the drop zone.
too busy searching for the better things in Life!
The thought came to me quickly and without warning as I reached out to catch it. I could do miracles, and I was at this place of power, how easy it would be.
who is coming into your home
Self-righteous pantywaist has no clue about the meaning of valor. But, Bill Clinton (and, by extrapolation, our sitting president also) knows the political implications of a failed mission.
Further to this, he regularly performs at top UK student nights, such as the nationwide weekly JUICED event – Every Friday at Wahoo Brighton and Chilli White Southampton and Keele.
10. U.S. Men Drop the Stick Again in a Major – The third time is supposed to be the charm, but then I guess no one informed this squad. Since winning in Osaka in ’07, the U.S. men have failed to finish a final in three straight Majors! As they say on ESPN, “C’mon Man”!
The next stage was to construct ‘footings’ for the vertical risers which would support the helix structure. Referring to the article, this will be made from 2×1 DAR with notches cut about 12mm into the edge, spaced at the required separation distance.
He likes to dance since he was young, At the student exhibition, if his friends did it wrong, he would leave the chair and get them to make it right. He liked to sing to himself too, Since grade 2-3, he started to collect CDs and more than 100 of them had been collected when he was in grade 5-6. Besides, he would always clean them carefully and put them in order. He listened to all of them too. She said Yoochun loved to sit on his dad’s lap while listening to the music and that was when she thought he should be singer or if not be musician. (chunnie is sooooo neat at this young age and Yoochun with his dad hurts me)
Also, jam setting time is a little random. The lemons provide the pectin here, as well as a dash of flavour, but you could use jamsetta instead, and follow the packet directions.
After World War I the British Empire was at the height of its world wide power. The rivalry between the United States and Great Britain during the 1920s and 1930s over who would control the world’s oil supply led American strategic planners to envision the day when America might be at war with Great Britain. War Plan Red ("Joint Army and Navy Basic War Plan -- Red"), formulated and approved in 1930 and declassified in 1974, set out America’s plan to eliminate Great Britain as a significant economic rival. Most of America’s plans revolved around the annexation of Canada and the islands of Jamaica, Barbados and Bermuda. These were American imperial dreams dating to the time of the American Revolution, when American forces were repulsed in their attempt to conquer Canada. American attempts to annex Canada during the War of 1812 were similarly repulsed.
“This is in recognition of the late Tunku’s contribution in leading the country to independence. His courage, wisdom and foresight managed to steer our nation to what it is today,” he said.
Today we are all showcasing the new One free with three set Fresh Start. I loved this little bird image- easy for the non coloring types! ;) I stamped it once onto my circle die cut, and then again onto ivory paper with blue ink. I cut out the little heads and the birds body and glued it to my focal image.
But Sanal Edamaruku spoilt this prospect. Within minutes, he clearly identified the source of the water (a drainage near a washing room) and the mechanism how it reached Jesus feet (capillary action). The local church leaders, present during his investigation, were far from pleased. See the investigation in detail on YouTube.
When posting the video, I did not express any personal view as to the merits of Lt. Col Lakin's argument, other than to say that he was a brave and honourable man, and certainly a bigger man than the rag taggle troop of media whores and pundits who are currently attacking him on tawdry, pretend news, sites such as the congenitally dishonest CNN and the progressively unwatchable MSNBC.
And supposedly the results will be useful because they'll enable people to compare schools via the league tables. More bollocks! League tables are pointless and meaningless - no one believes them or in them.
I think See’s statement “effective technology plans focus on applications, not technology” is correct. Districts already have media specialists to teach the basics. The purpose of technology use for the general education instructor is to use emerging technology to enrich and submerge students. General education teachers need to demonstrate how real world technologies can be transferred to the mach workforce environments.
At Bedford Gold and Tennis Club, par 36
Hookay then.
Hopefully I can get in some sort of routine soon and find more time for blogging.
Who said a tie was for around your neck? With head bands being so popular these days we thought we'd do a "How-to" post and show you a new way of wearing all your dad's old ties! If you dad doesn't have any ties, remember you can always buy some from us!
Disability Benefits
My answer would be unnecessary for whether I was starving or had just left another table, food would be placed before me. I could almost be guaranteed to find a plate of pinto beans and corn bread for starters. And as I ate this I would hear one of my cousins in the kitchen cooking away. Eventually, newly made food would make its way to the table. Probably fresh biscuits, fried potatoes, sliced garden fresh tomatoes, and if I was lucky, a side of greens. Then there would be a fried pork chop or two, and maybe a cobbler for desert. If at Aunt Carol Jane's I knew a slice of moist home made yellow cake would be available. She always made them and wrapped each piece in plastic wrap which kept them deliciously fresh and on hand for days. Little Debbie's Snack Cakes have nothing on my Aunt Carol Jane!
Tsugumi’s having trouble as her 1337 haxx0r skillz are being thwarted by someone else! Who could it be?
1 tomato
Many things have changed in my life in the past year. Becoming a women does not prevent me to do what I used to do, but interests change and emotions that are driving passion are structures differently then in my past life.
I once worked in Harrods, in the food halls, specifically caviar and then fine German meats. It was around the time I discovered that taking copious amounts of speed allowed you to party all night and then take the tube straight to work, to Harrods. It was never going to last. I was sacked in front of the beluga counter trying desperately to insult a woman buying food for a party. I once worked for a paint manufacturer in East London. I would deliver paint, industrial paint all over London and the South of England. One day a Nigerian man asked me if I wanted some chicken to eat. I said yes please. He then broke the neck of a chicken that had escaped from the slaughter house next door. He handed it to me and I held it whilst it shook. I left shortly after. I once worked as a life guard in a very old swimming pool which still had public baths, rows of them full of cockroaches. A horrible, spiteful old man found out that roaches were my phobia and put them in my locker. I left. I once worked as a photographer’s assistant and we shot models in swimwear in Trafalgar Square in winter. It was very cold, I left. I once worked in museum and stole a very tiny thing, a silver thing. No one missed. I still love it, obviously I left that day. I once worked in an agency that supplied dancers for pop videos, the accounts got out of hand and I was sleeping with the director. I left. I once worked in a supermarket with punk hair, they said dye it regulation brown, I said no and left. I once worked as a gardener in a celebrity garden and knocked over a statue, the head came off. I left. I once worked delivering furniture in Hackney, cheap furniture; plastic painted to look like brass. I delivered a bedroom suite to a family in a really run down block of flats. It consisted of a bed, two bedside cabinets and a shelving unit all for the princely sum of twenty five pounds. A week later the lady of the house called up and complained that the brass was coming off. I said for twenty five pounds did she really think it was brass? Depressed by cheap furniture I left. I once went to university to take a degree, got HIV and left. I once went to work with my Dad for the day, I was young. I hated it and vowed never to do it again. I love my Dad but not where he works. I once designed a flyer for a deaf theatre company. The play bombed, I left. I once worked as a teacher and found it entirely nourishing but knew I had to have gender reassignment and left. I can’t make a movie out of my life.
Authentique patterned paper - Loyal Collection
6 - 8P
I seek you when you’re gone; when you’re around I lose me,
Happy Crafting XX
We have seen a number of images by Sally Mann which have been perceived differently by different viewers. Some choose to see shocking images worthy of criticism of Mann as a mother. Others see, as I do, a moving and intimate portrayal of the artist’s children growing up in their natural environment. Mann captures the everyday but doesn’t shy away from the darker aspects of childhood, capturing their nudity in poses that seem adult-like.
- Blog about this giveaway. Leave a comment indicating that you've done so and post the link in a comment for 3 extra entries.
So . . . the Christmas weekend is here!! Are you excited? MP let slip (he loves that!) that he has a couple of presents to put under the tree, and I'm all flustered in my eagerness for the fun morning to get here. Presents! I don't know about you, but I love wrapped things. I'm not one for big presents at all--I enjoy my Christmas best when the gifts are laid back and whimsical--but I certainly love ripping into things. And I wonder what he'll think about his gift!
Right-handers have left-brain dominance which controls the areas of speech, language, writing, logic, mathematics, and science. It is thought of as the linear thinking mode.
Sure seems like candle stores and candle outlet stores are springing up all over in major malls and strip malls. All sorts of flavors like cinnamon rolls, apple pie, pumpkin pie, candy cane and caramel coffee frapachino, just to name a few.
Labour could have shone as the dispassionate voice of reform: rather than parroting the simplistic and wholly unworkable ‘something for something’ narrative, Byrne could have presented an approach fit for the 21st century, where medical advances see ever larger numbers of people who may never engage in paid employment live well into old age. And he wouldn’t even need to bring Beveridge into it.
Recommended for fans of comedies that explore young friendships and “fish out of water” syndrome.
All of these new platforms have some similarities that point to a more visual representation of things we want. In the past, it was just link farms and less imagery. Now the format of these sites, along with flickr's recent redesign, tumblr and other similar visual sites, are putting the photography on center stage. One might say that this is due to the proliferation of tablet and mobile device browsing. And it is much more conducive to that kind of web surfing than trying to read tiny type on a phone. It's an evolution of the way content is being displayed, that's all.
It was a hard discusion, as no one at TYSA had an easy answer. Was it better to starve or trade sex for food? These are the dilemmas girls can face here. Morality and chastity become a luxury when faced with starvation, and yet many girls do choose this because they have positive support from their peer community at this “sports organization.”
My husband Grant's parents came from Hawaii to visit us for two weeks in March, and during their stay we celebrated his mom's birthday. I know that she loves red velvet cake, and she also loves cheesecake, so I decided to make her a red velvet cake filled with cheesecake! I had never even heard of this cake until I read about it last year at 17 and baking (love her site!). At the time, I thought it sounded like a very decadent dessert and wanted to try making it, but I never had a chance to, until now!
In a large skillet, melt butter over medium heat and cook until foaming subsides. Add almonds and stir or flip until light brown. Add the margarine which should sizzle followed with the bell pepper. Saute for just a minute or two and remove from heat. Quickly stir in the seasoning and toss in the green bean mixture. Toss to coat beans in the warm oils and place in a warm casserole or serving dish.
The lucky winner is
Please read through the instructions here carefully. If you have any questions, please comment on this post or email me at shap97@gmail.com.
to work on his mandatory science fair project at home.
Paranoia, for the exile, is the pre-requisite for survival. One might find it hard to relate to, but I understand the words, the meaning it tries to portray, and the message it tries to deliver. For I have been in exile for the better half of my life, hiding not from people, but the self.
5. “In sickness and in health”… be there for them as they were there for you in your hour of need.
I couldn’t make it to 12:00 without a snack, so I had a string cheese and some crackers, which held me until my leftover based lunch.
STO: What is the reason behind the album title? How did you decide on the order of songs on the album?
“I am opening that door, officer, because I can do that. I am not a little girl….”
EXCLUSIVE: Video coverage of the RT Convention! Are you an avid reader of many supernatural authors besides Charlaine Harris; including Jeanine Frost? Look no further! We have an exclusive treat for you! In a series of videos from a close source, we have captured what happened at the RT Convention! Find out what you missed here!
Stronger: Well, the work out ball got dropped this week (forgive the pun). I was only able to work out twice this week. Not true....I could have worked out more, I just didn't. Which means that I could have burned more calories, but I didn't......moving on......
But I try never to do that. Because the news is so damn depressing. And a person who battles depression should not surround themselves with depressing things. (That's not to say I don't care about these things; I just can't deal with them.)
The Wasp Empire is coming to the lowlands. They are conquerers who known no bounds. No one believes they are a threat even as the swarm the region, except one very smart Beetle-kinden and the people he has encircled himself with.
Worn with Dolly Wink Dolly Sweet lash
PHILADELPHIA (CBS) – Hundreds of children dressed up as their favorite book characters for the Storybook Ball at the Please Touch Museum on Saturday evening.
to the corresponding PCT application is required because the national stage
Favorite genre:
Green come the shoots, aye April in the branches,
For my mom who is 74 years old,yes this is the big blasting news!
You know, not much has changed since I was a kid though. Well, adult themed music wasn't marketed as kid music because kids were singing it but kids listened to it. Many of my friends when I was in 2nd grade were listening to Madonna's Like a Virgin. It wasn't just my unchurched friends either. My friends from church were bought tapes like that. My parents wouldn't buy it for me and wouldn't let me listen to it. My mother listened to everything she bought for me before she gave it to me. It was worth it to her even if she had to waste $12 and toss it in the garbage where it belonged. I didn't understand then, but I do now.
Funny Pictures
I was at a friend’s fourteen-year-old daughter’s bonfire birthday party the other night. There was the special good food; venison from the island of Molokai, kalua pork, mahi-mahi, all cooked over the coals. After food was cooked the wood was piled on until we had a great bonfire. And of course there was music; Hawaiian music and hula.
down her station and checked to make sure the sharps box wasn’t full. She could
That luckless limb, his nobler noddle met,
Kid: Yeah, but not a big one.
Sep 04 Vancouver, BC, Canada
BUT the beach is VERY rocky. So, you need a thick towel (or you need to rent a lounge chair) and water shoes. But, if you’re prepared, it can be a great place to relax.
I curse under my breath at those hyenas from hell, and at the same time I pray for grace...His grace.
Accessories: Poppy Parade 1/2" stitched-poly Ribbon (#119263), Basic Jewels Rhinestones (#119246), Blender Pen (#102845), Heat Tool (#100005), Stampin Emboss Powder White (#109132), Jewelry Tag Punch (#117190), Uni Ball White Gel Pen (#105021), Baker's Twine Calypso Coral (#125573)
It is my intention to log on here every step. I hope this log does not prove to be the basis of my inquest. I hope I can find the strength to survive this brutal process and not become yet another ATOS ESA Suicide statistic. But I can’t promise.
The pictured bookshelf is in my study – and in front of the shelf of enduring favourites (my Austens, Brontes, Colwins and Mitfords), you will find stacks of what I have read or written about recently.
2. Share the link to the Christmas in the Valley blog on your facebook page with some sort of comment about how excited you are to attend and letting others know to check it out. THEN COME BACK HERE LEAVING A COMMENT SAYING YOU DID THIS.
Unless Kim Renfroe chose to wear an Audrey Regan origi- nal for her spring wedding; in that case, the air in the tires of her dream would carry her on a little farther. Not much, but a little.
Ask someone who did it last year. I invite any of you who Blogged From A to Z in April 2010 to leave a comment below telling how the challenge helped you as a blogger and otherwise. Some of the benefits that I have seen mentioned and personally experienced were improvement as a blogger and a writer, greater self-discipline, finding new blog friends, and increasing followers to each of our own blogs.
Deadline to Enter Is March 10th!
The TV is turned off
I wish I had nothing to write about.
Dear Parents of Nicholas Fordis:
That's just it. You won't know what effect your story will have on a person, or lots of people, unless you smack that self-doubt in the face and write your story. And then make it the best you can. And then, when it's ready, open the doors and let people see into the world you created.
Sajjad Shaukat
thin
Checking for previous VRTSddlpr installations… done
* I need to get off the computer and pack.
The moon will officially become full Saturday (May 5) at 11:35 p.m. EDT. And because this month’s full moon coincides with the moon’s perigee — its closest approach to Earth — it will also be the year’s biggest.
3-4 slices of bacon
I want to go back to sympathizing, to seeing you as real women with hearts, with feelings… but that can never be easy so long as you all are held up here, on some pedestal of your own design… cast as victims and good people who are allowed any transgression with excuses and forgiveness endlessly, while your sisters sit on the other side, scorned, even when they’ve spoken nothing false. You’re cutting the line there. I am thankful for it, because if it’s how you really feel, we need to see that. I wouldn’t want it hidden from sight. It just sucks because, I feel like… we were so close. So close to feeling each other, understanding each other. We were almost there.
Was I too proactive? My interpreters in college constantly preached the importance of making sure necessary accommodations were in place, and I learned that lesson well. While pursuing both my bachelor’s, then master’s degrees, I had note takers, interpreters, and for a short time – audio recordings of lectures. In work staff meetings, I supplement lipreading with an FM system to bluetooth speech directly into my hearing aids. When I visit different churches, I always inform a board member or the pastor that a loop system for hearing aid users would increase enjoyment of the service for those with hearing loss, and that mere headphones aren’t loud enough for everyone with a hearing problem. In other words, I advocate for myself and for others.
dies: Magnolia heartborder, swirl, leaves
Sam’s story is that he used to be a Cessationist. He went to school at Dallas, which is totally Cessationist. He even argued against the Charistmatic point of view. One of the things that really caused him to rethink his view was reading D.A. Carson’s book Showing the Spirit. The book tore down the arguments he had been using for Cessationism. Over time, other things happened like re-engagement with Jack Deere. Then he went to a prophecy meeting, and the man who prophesied about him, knew details that only God would know from Sam’s prayers, and they came true. But this wasn’t the only experience he had. Overtime God pulled him toward being a Charismatic, but his wife took a little longer, but eventually she came to believe as she started experiencing the Spirit moving in the Charismatic way. At first she thought he went off the deep end because he had taught her in the cessationist view. He accumulated a better relationship with God, freedom, joy, a new dimention of intimacy with His relationship with God. He wrote a full bio in a book called
At this point going to the beach in Dubai wasn't such fun. The water was warmer than bath water, and cooling off was not going to happen. We did try to go to the beach in the morning, but it wasn't much better. I'm not one for lying on the beach, it's just too boring. So we did a few other things. We went to Souk Madinat, once to look around, and once to take a trip on the little boats around the resorts surroinding it. There was even a sea turtle splashing around there. All we got to see of it was one of the flippers, but that's more than I've seen before. We also went to MoE and Ibn Battuta a few times. More of a relaxing week really, rather than trying to cram loads in.
I waited until the rain let up a bit
“We are socialists, we are enemies of today’s capitalistic economic system for the exploitation of the economically weak, with its unfair salaries, with its unseemly evaluation of a human being according to wealth and property instead of responsibility and performance, and we are all determined to destroy this system under all conditions.”
We are now trading recklessly and we are hard-form insolvent. So we, the people, need to decide what we are going to do. Is it too late? Clearly not. There is more than €85 billion at stake. And there is a mechanism in the Constitution for this.
Willie, the new puppy, frequently follows her nose to the compost pile. The other day we saw her black blur running by under a big orange pumpkin.
Sodium Caseinate – See Casein.
I have this very same bag and I love it. I carry it everywhere. It's perfect for those little daily emergencies when you need nail clippers, bandaids, or tissues. Best of all, it comes with almost everything you might need when you are "In A Pikle." Sewing materials, sanitizer, a mirror, nail accessories, a pad of paper, a pen, antibacterial wipes, paper clips, hair ties, and so much more. This is an amazing product and one that every teacher must have. It is perfect for field trips and for the busy teacher on the go! These are also great gifts. I got one for my mother and sister-in-law for Christmas and they were amazed. It's nice to find something that every woman will like.
69.29851, 16.042269
Meanwhile, troubles on the South edge of the Pine Ridge Reservation (the border between South Dakota and Nebraska) came into a strange, fuzzy focus in today’s edition of The New York Times. The Times published a disturbing story about the alcohol-induced heartache and misery anchored in Whiteclay, Nebraska, a notorious town squatting on the south border of the Pine Ridge Reservation.
Unity. The one thing I know for sure, if God is who I think He is; is that he wants unity among men. Unified in love, mutual respect, accepting each other as valuable and as equal. I have no doubt about this. The cutting behaviors that start from childhood, the teasing, the “making-fun”, the tearing down of fellow humans driven by the need to feel better about ourselves needs to be unlearned. Learning to love ourselves so that we won’t feel the need to engage in this type of behavior to try, albeit wrongly, to make ourselves feel better. I can start again today to change this in myself. It is not just a behavior of children. We all do it. I’m working on that daily. I must stop muttering about the person ahead of me in line, or at the stop-light. Sounds silly and trivial, I know, but it is a starting point, and it has to start with me.
The second Vintage Christmas Boutique is almost here and the house is currently being turned upside down in order to transform it into a festive vintage emporium! I am comforted by the sight of my favourite decorations finding their familiar little spots in the house ready for the season. I can't help it, I love this time of year, a whiff of cinnamon & cloves and I am away with the elves...
My Mom must have seen that I was about to crack. She shoved her last piece of ham in her mouth, threw back one last drink of coffee, and like an angel from heaven, whisked both children out of the restaurant to go play with toys.
That however was most definately not a difficult conversation.
A common noun is general.
No Egyptian Day!
3 cups thinly vertically sliced red onion
With this said and listed I created a online petition to get Lawrence O’Donnell from MSNBC fired for his unethical reporting. His latest has been a spew of lies regarding the church I belong to. This man has in no way done his research completely to be able to accurately report on something he knows absolutely nothing about.
girlfriends and,
Blackwater needs a voice more than ever, without it, things will continue to happen to us here, not for us!
In his one season as the head coach of St. Catharine, Tyndall led the team to a school-record 30-5 mark and its first ever appearance in the National Junior College Athletic Association (NJCAA) National Tournament. That year, he was named Region 7 National Coach of the Year, Kentucky Junior College Coach of the Year and Kentucky-Tennessee Junior College Coach of the Year.
Jacket:: gift
...Trese is definitely from the same mold as Hellblazer, just as it’s writer Budjette Tan is channelling equal parts Jamie Delano and Warren Ellis and artist Kajo Baldisimo does some impressive black and white work somewhere on a scale of Frank Miller and Eduardo Risso. But there’s a lot of other influences in there as well – is it just my prejudices or can I see Alan Davis as well?
The Pipes three...
If you're a real artist, I apologize right now for my ignorance of art supplies. I'm hoping to become more educated as I dive into this awesome world!
5th Street, between 8th Avenue and Prospect Park West
7) Spit your gum out before you enter. If I wanted to hear smacking, I’d go hang out with a cow.
Two clauses in the First Amendment guarantee freedom of religion. The establishment clause prohibits the government from passing legislation to establish an official religion or preferring one religion over another.
“Now getting to college has been part of the American dream for generations, Senator,” ABC’s George Stephanopoulos asked Santorum in an interview on “This Week. “Why does articulating an aspiration make the president a snob?”
Amish ya fiction?? I think this is a first for this genre for me… How awesome does this book sound?? I just got an email from an ARC tour I’m with that I got selected to read this! So super excited!
That cold February morning, after a night of sleepless anxiety, I informed my dear hubby, over coffee, that I was “Done.” I stood, an old cliché, with fist raised and shouted, “I’m sad and just can’t take it anymore.” I was over-stimulated yet exhausted. He was wary. “But Honey,” he began. I whirled like a dervish and pointed, “Don’t talk to me. I’m tired of words, words, words.”
Thanks for all your comments and support!
So now I am back at work, inundated, facing my ineptitudes vis-a-vis netorking, not to mention the very real possibility that if I can manage to jump at all, I may end up leaving purgatory for a job that works me just as hard for a quarter of the salary (I would be inclined to call that “hell”, although I realize qualitative factors should, in theory, come into play – more on that in another post). Needless to say, my parachute is reflecting black. Maybe it’s not really black, but that’s what I see today. I remain hopeful, but I can no longer deny just how much work it is going to take in order for me to make a seamless transition.
Of course, she rolled her eyes at me and declared that I am “overprotective.” :-). Then she went out to ride some more, and I let her. — Steff
After that night we started talking on the phone every couple of days. It was kinda crazy how strong our feelings for each other were. Around this time we had only known each other for about two months and we were deeply in love. Since things between us were moving soo fast, we thought it would be best if we met in person. You know, to make sure we weren't romanticizing our relationship. - I should mention that by this point Mr. CC and his ex had filed for legal separation. And I had told my husband I wanted a divorce and was moving out. - So in mid-March Mr. CC flew down to Vegas for five days. It was like we'd always been together, we just clicked. Although I will admit that being around him the first hour was very weird. When you've only talked to someone on the phone and seen a couple pictures of them, it's a very strange feeling to actually be sitting next to them. There was a point when I told him not to just talk and not look at me! hahaha The five days flew by and before we knew it he was on a plane back to Calgary.
Here are the wordstrips:
I guess being the odd one out in the entire Caribbean and insisting there needs to be more ethnic parity on the CCJ and watching Portia Simpson-Miller receive more plaudits than her for embracing the CCJ (whose headquarters housed in Trinidad) was too much and she had to get in on the action and limelight.
For those great crimes, priests would withhold absolution, until the perpetrator had gone and confessed his or her crime to the police, and subjected themselves to the process of the law of the state. “Yes,” the priest would say. “I will pronounce absolution for your sins, but first, you must surrender yourself to the police. When you have done that, I will come and pronounce absolution.”
The origin of pi.
Last Sunday my friend Noelle had posted this link. It is incredible…now I don’t stomach Glen Beck well…but the interview is incredible, and worth every minute. Papillion was GLUED, intrigued and touched….Please take the time. The Neilsons story, of surviving a plane crash, allowing there faith in God, never alter there faith, and who they were as a couple and a family is beyond inspiring….and with that I am done writing a full on Chapter/Blog Entry…I deeply felt the need to share some of the tender teaching, learning, and healing moments we have been blessed with lately….
Remove from pan, and place on a rack or oven-safe plate inside a warm oven to keep warm until ready to serve.
“Hello?”
Since he can’t operate with his scorched mitts, Doc Vic has been assisted by mute Madeline. This is a departure for Smith, since she was basically cast as an ambulatory bosom in most films of the era. Here, both her mammoth bust and tiny voice remain unexploited for most of the film (she gets a few lines at the end). It’s a touchingly inept performance, seemingly modelled on the facial expression you get on a young Springer Spaniel, all big wet eyes, but it’s powerless to mar the film. It’s kind of RIGHT. Smith seems a lovely lady in interviews, although she has a strange tendency to denigrate feminism (I guess a lot of feminists denigrated her and her work), suggesting that the entire women’s movement was the work of flat-chested viragoes jealous of her gigantic attributes (Am I distorting her argument here? Well, a bit).
When Matthew went outside to play,
-My boys turned 19 and 5 months. Crazy!
Having the one diet coke a day is lovely. (My only real side effect, I should mention, was a slight headache, no doubt due to the reduced caffeine intake.) However, this diet is so low salt that the Diet Coke isn’t as good as it could be if I’d just eaten salty nuts or beef jerky. But can’t think that way.
I refuse to go along with this week's warm, feel-good celebrations of Harper Lee's novel (published fifty years ago today), To Kill a Mockingbird. Simply put, I think that novel is racist, and so is its undying popularity. It's also racist in a particularly insidious way, because the story and its characters instead seem to so many white people like the very model of good, heartwarming, white anti-racism.
I'm now looking forward to next summer, so I can try my hand at more flavours, like cucumber-chilli, pineapple-chilli, and chilli-chocolate (can you sense a theme here?)... in the mean time, I've got a freezer full of these pineapple-lime treats left over from this summer's festivities, and I intend to eat them no matter how cold it gets, because they are delicious.
I sat down in a blue hospital-style recliner and they pulled a curtain for privacy and took my blood pressure and then hooked me up. I had two monitors put on my belly--one to track the baby's heartrate, and one to measure uterine contractions.
My muse has been after me for a while, telling me to write, although I’ve resisted listening. My last post, So You Want to Write A Novel?, represents my beginning attempt to simplify into a plan of action, the baby steps to building a manuscript. The outline will expand as my knowledge expands.
How’s your prayer life? It’s interesting how we are often prone to talk to everyone else about our problems and needs, but not to the One who can do something about them.
And by the way - at one point, I was traveling 3+ times a month for work. Granted, most of that was on Southwest, but to this day I have NEVER earned a ticket on another carrier. I don't see how a leisure traveler ever could do so.
“No.” was the most common answer.
5: SHIRLEY & LEE - That's What I'll Do
It seems like too much to explain but the boat now tips towards public school rather than homeschool. So she is enrolled for the fall. I have filled out the piles of paperwork to document her age & existence.
I'm convinced they do! So walk very quickly through the free-flying bat exhibits at the zoo.
We came up with several ideas.
So here is the before, not bad..
She always has knitting needles in her worn and delicate hands. She's fast, quick and precise. She's held a passion for books in her heart, which carried down to my mother. I always saw on a different page than my mother and grandmother. But now i know all the stories and life there is within the walls of the library. I'm slowly beginning to love books and can't get enough of them......I'm picking up the knitting needles and carrying on my grandmother with every stitch... every over, under and pull through.... When i do, i see her tanning on the front porch laughing at my brothers running ramped around the yard.....i think of her soft lap and how comforting it felt to sit there when my parents were away, always with an orange bowl of ice cream in hand. She is a magnificent lady, my grandmother. She has overcome, she has found happiness where it is to be found, and she has always loved me....History. They married at eighteen. My mother was born when she was nineteen. She set up house and took care of a husband....of a baby. She bound her breasts, as it was healthier for a baby to drink formula. I imagine she had times that she would look at her baby, at her husband and think, what am i doing here? How will my life go and how will we get by? She gave birth two more times and then began working.....She was 23......History.
3. Mix in flour and baking soda.
Also, if you post it on your blog I would appreciate it if you let your readers know where you got them.
Nothing can beat, when you stop for lunch at 5 in the evening.
my nerve or if the trucks were really that bad. I arrived in the Sault
In a blender, combine the egg yolks, salt, pepper and 1 tablespoon of the lemon juice. Set aside.
This card is one that I created for my guest designer spot but I wanted something that went with the theme of gardening better. I like this card so I have decided to share it and also enter it into a challenge or over at Made Especially for you: 3 flowers. I made the flowers with Flower Shoppe and the tree is from Straight From the Nest. I went with Earth tones and finished it off with brown twine.
Slow-cooked pork belly ($15) is meltingly soft, simmered in a heady stock of star anise, garlic, chilli and soy. Drizzle the sauce over plain white rice and you’ve got a bowl of comfort food that hugs you right back.
Barry Oakley – bass
Black Sabbath vs Black Francis?
Scared, I began to dance…ever so self consciously. If he noticed I was dancing the world’s most awkward dance that day, he had given no clue…rather, he gave instructions.
Not any longer, you can bet that what you are about to see by the fabulous Tami, will be repeated by me in the near future!
that I get three dates associated with them:
Life is a joy
Thanks for stopping by . . .
Make her pleasure terrific
Potluck....dont u love potluck.........??????
One thing that bothers me is all the deaths in this story, made more shocking by the fact that they are young people. This does not sit easily with its generally light tone. The story has other faults, most obviously the clumsiness of its climax. However, on the whole it is a worthy ending for the 1963-1989 series.
Do you have a pot rack? If so, please add a comment with a link to your pictures.
This is where we shine! Our seductive skills are excellent; we tend to feel strong passion and desire. For me, a song could trigger an extensive fantasy of intense romance. Often, I wind up singing, dancing and longing for a Shakespearian type love affair till I make myself sick.
This motto is similar to the mottoes ‘you’ve only got once chance to live’ or ‘enjoy it while you can’. People often use these phrases to persuade their friends to take risks or do something they normally wouldn’t do.
I called the handymen who did a ton of the work around here when we had the fridge/floor fiasco. I explained what I wanted to do, showed them pics, then showed them our upstairs fireplace and THEY SAID EASY PEASY SQUEEZY!!
Though he only mentions them once by name, he's clearly discussing Guinness and their methods.
What have you missed? Well, Spring Break has come and gone. We enjoyed a week of being at home without all the responsibilities of school. However, Jacob still played baseball throughout the week. Easter has also come and gone. I served Easter dinner on our front porch this year. The weather was beautiful and we enjoyed the company of our neighbors for the day. I have also discovered several new recipes that I want to share when time is more abundant. Oh, we have added our first "critters" to the farm. (If you have read my blog for any length of time, these are the same critters that I really don't like. However, I do enjoy what they produce so we have given them a home). We have also planted part of our garden, but we have a lot left to do!
- 1 tsp ground caraway seed (I couldn't get any)
Glue your handmade borders in place following the lines of the photo. Pick a journaling square from the cardstock sticker sheet, journal and add in place on the layout. I like to outline this with my black pen for it to stand out a bit better.
Calico Joe by John Grisham
I had a different book I want to review and recommend but something came across my facebook feed that I thought was important to share. February 19th is Rememberance Day is a day to remember and never forget the internment of Japanese Americans and immigrants during World War II.
Step #1 is obviously the most labor-intensive, but you can draft in Google Docs; in fact, I encourage you to do exactly that. I will be able to see your revision process much more clearly, which will facilitate everything from conferences to the final product. (Oh, and on a parenthetical note: A grade-less essay ought to be run through the same rigorous process as a graded one, and that means you could use anything from the DAMAGES+ rubric to our study of the Toulmin model. You will be asked to focus on some of these techniques and tools over the next week or two, regardless.)
Soon the minute is up. It's not that hard to push hard, when I know it will be over in a minute. Once the :59 clicks back to :00, I allow myself to push the down arrow, back to five. Then I get three full minutes of a more reasonable pace. I chant the number I'm waiting for, the number I'll see when it's time to crank that resistance up for another minute. If I ended my hard minute at eight minutes, I start to chant, in my head, eleven...eleven...eleven. And when 10:59 clicks over to 11:00, I crank it up again. I do these circuits over and over.
Storm or sunshine be our share;
Group 3 Conditioning
By and large those four predictions did come to pass, although the pockets of relative prosperity are now being eroded. The decline in living standards among people previously privileged is beginning to expand the base of opposition to the political and economic status quo. Those so privileged within a given country tend to be well delineated; less obvious but no less important is that all working people in advanced capitalist countries are privileged in relation to people in all other countries. That latter privilege was a fruit of imperialism, even if the rewards heavily flowed to the top; but now imperialism has dialectically evolved into a relationship that erodes the living standards of working people within those countries as ever more manufacturing and services are transferred to new low-wage havens. Now all of the benefits are flowing to the top (the “one percent”) of the advanced capitalist countries, with some diversion to the very top within the developing countries to which production is transferred.
Tom Peterson
Great big melting pot …
And I feel bad about it.
Then reality hit.............i was really gonna do it.......the same thing i do every year yet always seems such a huge task....
Sorry the pic is blurry, zoom isn't the greatest. I was disappointed in these feet. The fronts where shod and looked long too.
Pet owning is a very special bond that you get to share with an animal that becomes the part of your and your family life and gets to be called as your pet. With this, come many responsibilities as well. Taking great care and providing your pet with the basic and essential needs should be your primary concern regarding the well being of your pet. Veterinarians’ job gets to be counted as very significant in this regard.
And Dineocrat comments:
Mulan is a Disney movie that was released on June 19, 1998. Though not the daughter of a king or other form of royalty, nor married to a prince or the equivalent, Mulan is often regarded as one of the Disney Princesses. She my favourite of the lot and to me, the best of them!
to rear up on its hind legs
Right now, I ain’t all that sure who’s my enemy and who’s not. I know for sure Scooter Cobb is, he’s got a sneaky suspicion I know the truth of what happened to Daddy so he’d rather see me dead than alive. And, I got a notion his son Sam, feels the same; with Sam being a policeman things are just gonna get worse. That other detective, Jack Mahoney, I’m not too sure about him.
The Gift-Giver's mockery made opening his jaw to speak a trial. "You can't not know how dangerous this is. Sherim and Clearsight do not mix."
If you’re doing Screnzy and your pagecount goal is also 100, you’re probably really surprised by my pagecount, which you can see in that little Screnzy tracker-badge (not to be confused with a tracker jacker). I only have to write 3 1/3 pages per day, so I should have 16 2/3 pages at the least, but I’ve been writing like crazy. Especially yesterday (I wrote 15+ pages – I lost count) and on Monday (I wrote 12 pages).
ISBN-10:
I think I have read my fill, my complete fill of wrap up blog posts from everywhere. Seriously. So much verbal verbosity had gone through me that I threw out on facebook and twitter yesterday to describe your 2010. But in one word. One single word to sum up your whole past year. Because we can so easily hear about one's life if given a thousand words. But how fascinating is it, to be able to know one's life for the last 365 in just a single word. I learnt so much from all of you. So thank you for sharing. Now it is my turn. My year, was saturated.
I am a person whose natural complexion is fairly pale, so I have to work very hard at keeping my tan. Sometimes everyday life can get pretty hectic and make it difficult to find the time to keep up with my tanning bed visits. That is why I am always looking for alternatives, such as self tanners to help me on the moments in life when keeping up with my tan seems impossible. Since summer is here I really want to keep up with my tan so I can wear my shorts, capris and, of course, cute summer dresses. I was given the chance to do a review for Famous Dave's Self Tanner and the results were very pleasing. I have read a lot about the tanner in magazines and online so getting to test the product first-hand was very nice.
from their guns, their fury, they unleash.
Jaela - Love you Jae Baby
Here are the books I read on Holiday.
Have you ever tried to teach your child or students "I statements"? It is so frustrating and difficult. The terminology just doesn't seem to fit into their little mouths.
why . . . the best buddy, of course!
needed to interpret it into a single package, sold as a consumer product. As the number of bundled software/data packages(Data Services) proliferated
It's time for another fun challenge here at Send a Smile 4 Kids and this time we are challenging you to create a card for a child using fall colors- whatever you interpret fall colors to be is fine as long as it is a card appropriate for a child. It can be a Halloween card if you wish, but please nothing scary and avoid images such as tombstones. Even if you do not send your card to SAS4Kids (and we sure hope you do:), the cards entered in our challenge have to be appropriate for our kids.
Accentuate Your Elegance With IWC Replica Watches
I plan to take the lessons I learned from the way Robert structured the Platform Building challenge and apply them to the personal challenges I set myself.
Metallic single limb & ‘U’ Tube Manometer.
Lunch Club – Wednesdays 12pm-2.30pm at Christ Church Hall. Lunch Club supporting people over 60 to live independently. Friendly and supportive group where individuals can socialise with others and enjoy a freshly cooked lunch. Cost: nominal charge Contact: Louise Dyson, Foxhill & Birley Carr Live at Home Scheme – 07906 583430
2 May 2012, Publication – and even more on Book Signings
A Sprinkling of Christmas, and Hanukkah. I made Christmas and Hanukkah cookies with a fabulous group of women friends. I try not to mix the holidays together, and I am not the least bit comfortable with the star-of-David tree-topper being marketed this year, but I think it’s kosher to let Hanukkah and Christmas cookies co-exist on a counter-top for a few seconds before they are devoured.
After a mere few days after the official release of YG group 2NE1‘s debut single, the netizens are already at comparing before and after debut photos of member Park Bom.
I did not spend the night at the hospital. I'm too old for that spending the night with a full sized man in a single bed.
So every little spot where it might be a bit quiet, a bit green and peaceful is a treasure.
Symptoms: Emotional/Irritated! I feel bad for Mr. Southbay! Had a little break out on my tummy...My OB said it happens but typically later in the third trimester.. but it appears to be clearing up. So glad! My face is going through another "Break Out" moment..ugh!
This is, of course, just a very quick example, and it is only the first step. But you can see how important it is to create the set-up for tension in the overall GMC so that you have the opportunity to put tension into every scene.
Bankomat not working and leaving without doing any shopping: 5 times.
MAH MW, HAGEN NA, PAULING-SHEPARD K, et al. Understanding influenza vaccination attitudes at a Canadian cancer center. Am J Infect Control 2005; 33:243-50.
Now, we are not talking — let us be very clear; we talk out of both sides of our mouth, and you know this, dear Steve — so on the one hand we say we are talking about the destruction and the reconstruction of what you think of as your financial systems upon the planet of Earth. But what we do not talk about is such a collapse and such chaos that people are turning in panic, and running in the streets, and are finding themselves without any resources, without any ability to cope — for that would not be of love.
Many of you will never have heard of Blue Mercedes but the chap on the left is a 'boy' from our town with his 5 minutes of pop fame. A very 80's synth pop group who had a few hits and even appeared on Top of the Pops & Blue Peter. I know his Dad & Uncle really well so when I spotted this record in one of the charity shops for 50p I had to buy it for my vinyl collecting sister - she's done some more research and has even managed to find a YouTube video of these two strutting their stuff - here - have a look you never know you might even like it!!
To prove a foreign national has the requisite “exceptional ability,” the employer must file documentary evidence showing 1) the widespread acclaim and international recognition accorded the foreign national by recognized experts in the foreign national’s field; 2) documentation showing the foreign national’s work in that field during the past year did, and the foreign national’s intended work in the United States will, require exceptional ability; and 3) documentation about the foreign national from at least two of seven identified categories involving receipt of prizes, published or authored articles and other prestigious honors.
MEMORY AND OCD. People with remarkable autobiographical memory may be more prone to OCD-like behaviors, according to a new study. It turns out that two areas of the brain that are larger in people with exceptional memory are also larger in people with OCD. Find out more.
All these and more factors in human existance are turning negative, because the human race is concentating on “ego” instead of God. So He will continue to take action to change the focus. It will be up to Him whether He will allow a remanent to exist to restart a new human world or whether to just kill off Humanity. If we humans can change in time, this might help him decide.
Hips: 41.75" (no change)
Weight Management
Well you don’t have to tell your kids that anymore. Here’s how…
Originally, the Brotherhood had repeatedly announced that they weren't going to seek the presidency so they wouldn't appear to be completely taking over, but after the parliamentary elections and the huge majority they and the salafist al-Nour party got, the Brotherhood's Freedom and Justice Party announced that Khairat al-Shater would be their presidential candidate.
The last days I spend swimming in the sea, walking the beaches and going for a afternoon to the dunes of our dessert. I used to do that a lot before, many days we would enjoy the quietness of the dunes after work.
So when I got back home,
Tonight be sure that you tell each and every person you love, just how much you love them, if you have children hold them tight and thank God for giving you such a beautiful gift.
Our cute Aaron graduated from Lone Peak High School yesterday.
Since this is their first pronouncement on matters of substantive design law it is perhaps a relief that the ECJ has followed the lower instances all the way down the line - there are no surprises, good or bad.
Oh, and in case I didn’t make it clear, these books aren’t just cerebral. Megan's writing also encompasses tenderness and beauty and the sheer numinous otherness of the gods. And here she is to talk about a book of fairytales she had as a child:
But I broke my own Muni rules of decorum...Not only had I sort of seat hogged with my bag, but man, the yelling.
F*ck eatin’ pastries.
Just thought I’d share… I ordered the new Meet the Phonics set for my girls, and a new set of sight words flashcards for Braska to take to school in the fall. (Her favorite motivator for tough tasks!) She has plain-old worn through her first set!
Because I couldn't get there, she'd missed her appointment, an intake meeting with the doctor's staff to do paperwork. It was kind of miserable, but at least she hadn't missed medicine.
and the Reasoning
20. Steve Morse solo / Silhouettes In Disguise
Same piece of artwork, you have no knowledge of the creator, you think it is a work of genius... and then you overhear the artist telling racist jokes at the bar. Think less of the artwork now?
I've done the comparison of the one box V's a white cardboard magazine file for each of the colour collections and the main 'branded' scraps I have e.g. Funky Hand, My Craft Studio, Forever Friends & Me To You, Forever Friends Black and Gold...
Scott Hamilton / The Island of Exiles / 26
Music Stores
Well, he succeeded in this, and I did enjoy reading it, also because of the style and language used. There were many words I had to look up, not being at all familiar with military terms (furlough? That certainly wasn't part of the curriculum when I learnt English at school several decades ago!), and Mr. Thayer must have done a lot of research; there are footnotes on almost every page, and an extensive source register makes up the last 10 % of the book.
#12 1961 Eric Salmanca EP Jefferson 440 Yards 47.6
But you can be refund a part of the rake if the poker sites provide rakeback. More specifically, the online poker rooms will set a percentage that you can get back in the rake you contributed in their sites. The average of the rakeback offers is 30%. Sometimes, you will find someone provide a better offer or even worse. If you play a lot of poker, it wouldn’t be that difficult to earn a few hundred dollars back via rakebacks. Actually, the professional online poker players can gain $4000 which is only the amount of rakeback. And we have not counted how much they win in the games yet.
A: Because there are twenty of them.
I’m just saying…!
PS3 review
The finale finished with an excellent sequence accompanied by the following song. I couldn't help but snigger.
Two special New York Bridal paradises and boutiques:
Mulder remained stoic and said, "See, Scully. It's no UFO. It's an agency trick to keep us from the truth. A covert agency has fashioned a flying craft resembling a sleigh pulled by reindeer. The operator in red must be a radio controlled automaton. No doubt it is powered by radioactive isotopes to prevent it being detected by radar. The power source is leaving no heat signature - it cannot be tracked."
Whether you are just having your first child, watching your child become a teenager or sending them off to college next year, putting money away for their future education is important. 529 plans, like Wisconsin’s EdVest plan, are great ways to save.
This is a hefty and substantial tome. Cover to cover, it is pushing 2 inches thick with 440 pages of slight puffery that is typical of the era. I have read far worse in turn of the last century technology history reviews. If the title page is any indication, this is probably the best book ever written! Or something like that.
I have made a couple of little Easter baskets for my Grand kids, the green one is from my 4 year old Grandson who loves green and dinosaurs, not sure how I was going to fit dinosaurs into the theme, so just stuck to green, lol. The pink basket is for my 2 year old grand daughter who loves pink and girly things.
13. All major disability rights groups in Britain (including RADAR, SCOPE, UKDPC, NCIL and Not Dead Yet UK) oppose any change in the law believing it will lead to increased prejudice towards them and increased pressure on them to end their lives.
And by this point, neither could I.
Well, we need a menu and we need a theme and we need it ‘now’.
One friend of mine said she was baptized in the name of the Trinity doctrine. But she was not satisfied. Hmm..what could it be? So she got baptized in the name of Jesus Christ. She got happy and said that is what I was looking for.
Where your mother was corrupted.
of scarcity.) To put it quite bluntly, the purpose of wars is to compel weaker nations to take this surplus off the hands of the stronger, running up debts, if need be, in order to pay for it. Then, the threat of further war is necessary to ensure that the debts and the interest on them shall not be repudiated.
4) Finding Our Political Will to End Poverty Remarkably, we made it through 2011 without any major cuts to programs focused on hungry and poor people. We maintained the safety net in this country, and it is doing exactly what it is supposed to do.
Wednesdays - Saturdays, 12 Noon - 5p.m.
Janene
We wear red shirts and bluejeans on Fridays ... in support of the troops. Not sure how that supports them, but it's traditional. So I love Fridays.
Rob: No. And I won't if you say anything bad about her. I love Siri! She's awesome.
So, check it: Before the show started, I was thinking how we were probably due for a What Up With That?, I was pining for the return of Blizzard Man, and when the Digital Short started, I identified it as a Weekend at Bernie’s parody as soon as mention was made of partying with the boss. I guess I know this show too well.
Anyone taking bets on whether I will exercise today?? Lx
Huw's family lives in a Welsh village in the shadow of a valley, and all the men work all day in the coal mine perched at the top of the valley, above the town, its smokestacks belching black clouds into the air above the town. Huw's memories stretch back to a time when he was a young boy, when the coal and the smoke had not yet stained the valley's green hills black. Huw's recollections of his boyhood begin in idyllic bliss, recalling the beauty of the valley, the love of his parents, Mr. and Mrs. Morgan (Donald Crisp and Sara Allgood), the fresh-faced beauty and sweet smiles of his sister Angharad (Maureen O'Hara) and sister-in-law Bronwyn (Anna Lee), the camaraderie of his four older brothers. The happiness of these memories is deliberately exaggerated, marinating in over-ripe sentimentality and down-home charm. Looking back, Huw remembers his early boyhood as a paradise, rooted in the stern but loving ritual of home life: deep-seated respect for his parents, religion, love and generosity. This life is strongly ritualized and formalized, with a set of encoded traditions that drive daily life. Every day, the men go off to work in the mornings, then return home in the late afternoon, winding through the streets singing while the women and children come out to watch. They deposit their daily earnings with the matriarch of the family, settle down to dinner after prayers, and eat heartily without speaking — "I never met anyone whose talk was better than good food," Huw says. Afterwards, the young men are given their spending money, sent off to have the nightly fun that their day of hard work has earned them. It's a simple and sometimes difficult life but a fulfilling one, and Ford purposefully spends some time establishing this traditional existence's appeal and its grace, because the rest of the film is concerned with the erasure of all this tradition and stability.
THAT’S PRETTY RICH COMING FROM JULIA
In a section of this chapter on Monks and Monasticism, Gibbon begins an innocuous tangent on obedience (meaning: the growth of rules in monasteries), but the his overview of monastic regulations quickly devolves into a long tirade on monastic peculiarities. Over and over again in this chapter, Gibbon makes a valiant effort to contain his scorn and enmity but loses the battle more often than not.
Here is what you do:
“Ernest Hemingway, George Orwell and the rest sent back graphic dispatches from the front line, and their work has left the historical impression that Europe’s first open war between fascists and the combined forces of communism, socialism and social democracy was well covered and understood. Yet away from the eyes of the war reporters, argues Paul Preston, there was another Spanish Civil War, in which thousands of civilans were systematically murdered, and their deaths subsequently obscured”.
Point 3. TO find your schedule it might also be good to start constraints; this means making a weekly schedule and marking through times you can not write and then starting there.
I have these pretty things to stare at while I’m home cuddling with Paisley :) Thank you again for all of your support, everyone! I honestly don’t know what I’d do without you! If you got through this entire post, kudos to you! I’m sorry it’s so long! I’ll let you get back to your Wednesday night, now! Oh, and Happy Leap Year! :)
“We’re writing a record number of offers, but we’re not seeing a record number of closings and that’s because it’s so competitive,” Glenn Kelman, chief executive of Redfin Corp., told The Wall Street Journal.
12. Let's get married - Al Green / 5:35
Thank you, God, for summer break, awesome memories and family and friends to share it with!
He pours himself and Agatha a glass of Red Wine, and notices that no one is eating, even though the table is covered from end to end in food.
TAA DAA. Yay indies!
God created the world (Gen. 1:1-25).
I could hardly take my eyes of myself in the photos - I was so slim. And even though that was probably the effects of the Dumped Diet (you know the one - you get dumped, you shuffle salad around on your plate for many weeks and believe that you'll never love anyone like that again), I really looked quite nice.
The image is Evangeline Retro from Pollycraft - I decided to paperpiece her dress, the flower in her hair and the flowers - I thought it would be easier than colouring it but it was so fiddly to cut out - I like the way it looks though.
Me: "There is no or what. If you are still hungry you can have fruit."
Neotame is also more stable at higher temperatures than aspartame, so it’s approved for use in a wider array of food products, including baked goods.
Here’s the formula that led to this lesson: I’ve been wanting to try a Jigsaw all year + end of Similarity unit where we talk about interesting real-world problems + group whiteboards + day after modeling/discussing problems as a class = Expert Groups (which isn’t actually anything super innovative – I’ve seen this idea in writings on group dynamics before)
(Not that there's anything wrong with people who ride the short bus.)
We teeter on darkness as long as we remain seeking to occupy the light space. This is where darkness draws its strength as a purveyor of fear and the unknown. This is also where darkness has its attraction as a platform for autonomy. Asdam states, “Darkness has of course the effect of facilitating a loss of subjectivity; one is not perceived clearly, which allows for a certain freedom, but you are not perceiving as clearly either and space gains a certain subjectivity from that.” In taking away ones perception in the darkness, we are unconsciously applying prejudice against what that space may be capable of offering us.
We believe in one Lord, Jesus Christ, the only Son of God, eternally begotten of the Father, God from God, Light from Light, true God from true God, begotten, not made, of one Being with the Father. Through him all things were made. For us and for our salvation he came down from heaven: by the power of the Holy Spirit he became incarnate from the Virgin Mary, and was made man. For our sake he was crucified under Pontius Pilate; he suffered death and was buried. On the third day he rose again in accordance with the Scriptures; he ascended into heaven and is seated at the right hand of the Father. He will come again in glory to judge the living and the dead, and his kingdom will have no end.
BUT, let's face it, there is simply no getting around how good these songs are. The playing is FEROCIOUS and tight, and possibly even better than in the originals. Plus, there are enough changes in the songs to keep them fresh (although the structure basically remains the same). In addition, each of the band-members gets a solo-section, which might be considered slightly tacky (if you're cynical) but are all well performed. Rick Wakeman throws in excerpts from his then-new solo career, Bruford gets a decent (though not exceptional) drum solo, Squire extends "The Fish" into ten-minutes of monstrous bass-riffage, and Howe graces us with a runthrough of "Mood For A Day" (not to mention his excellent solo in "Yours is No Disgrace").
The deal being negotiated with China is to return gold that was stolen from China during WW2 in exchange for having all US debts written off. That is a better deal than the 300 years of debt slavery the banksters are offering.
Good Monday Morning Peeps!!!
“Yeah, I think so.”
I also love the TJ’s fingerling potatoes or “tiny potatoes,” roasted with a little olive oil, garlic and sea salt. If you have cravings for french fries, roasted potatoes are a great, clean french fry fix.
Analysts said the decline can be attributed to two main causes - a natural population decrease as Baby Boomers enter their later years and die at a faster rate than younger whites have children, and a migration from California since 2001 among whites who sought affordable housing as real estate costs soared.
Its front page news was a story about a boy who had been encouraged to read by the Duchess of Cornwall. I could not find any story anywhere about anyone being killed by a bus from outer space falling on their head so, when I got home, I checked the BBC News channel (no unusual deaths; no mention of death from above) and then checked my e-mails to find one from mad inventor John Ward - designer and fabricator of the highly-prestigious Malcolm Hardee Awards for comedy.
I had a nice non-stamping weekend---painting garage doors, weeding flower beds, cleaning refrigerators...all that fun type stuff! I did manage to whip up a few card sets to give as gifties for Mother's Day. I used Jen's Sketch For You To Try (SFYTT April).
Fish should be flaky through the middle when it is done.
B.A. (Honours) Economics
-1 Tbsp Lemon juice
Preservation Hall – Visitors should not leave New Orleans without seeing a 30 minute show of traditional Dixieland jazz at Preservation Hall. We met a family from England that had come to New Orleans just to see a performance. It’s that good. Being that legendary, you will need to wait in line for the $12 ticket if you want a seat. There are six benches that hold 20 people in the hall, and everyone else stands (it holds about 50-60 people). So it pays to wait outside about an hour before the show to guarantee a great seat.
Ugh, this whole process is so long and difficult. Every part of it has been scary and overwhelming, and now that I actually am pregnant, I can scarcely imagine ending up with a living baby. I mean, I guess I can because I specifically set out to be pregnant again. That in and of itself is a leap of faith I suppose. But most times my imagination fails me and I can only see what I have known. Sudden, unsuspecting death. Pain. Heartbreak.
After Nhung’s favorite, let’s continue with Linh’s favorite: Sooyoung.
All political parties have regular leadership challenges.
“There stands a beautiful hall near the fountain beneath the ash. Out of it come three maids, whose names are Urd, Verdande and Skuld. These maids shape the lives of men, and we call them norns. There are yet more norns, namely those who come to every man when he is born, to shape his life, and these are known to be of the race of gods; others, on the other hand, are of the race of elves, and yet others are of the race of
Oh, and the whole idea of punishing these bastards by pulling your money out and changing over to credit unions? Evidently those nice people at the Fed will make up for your irresponsibility by propping up your former bank until someone can come along and purchase it:
Stuff the insides with the lemon, onion, and herbs.
-dropkick by Jericho in the corner sending Punk outside.
2. Sephardic Spinach Patties
Well, that's that. I don't have anything else to say about Easter so if you're off, enjoy the rest of your break, if not, have a good week.
Here are our sponsors for the week.....
6. If You Don’t Know (3:12)
And everyone is up there the war will just continue up there also AGHHHHH so there will not be any virgins up there either as the killing will never stop unless we STOP IT NOW RIGHT HERE RIGHT NOW.
The birthday boy did look like a drowned rat, so I guess I had the last laugh...
The commotion he created was both embarrassing to myself (obviously)and totally unnecessary and so I left with his accusations ringing loudly throughout the building.
Enjoy the payasam!!
The large hearts are punched from my favorite punch by Family Treasures ( I have used it several times lately...teehee), and the other punches I used are...small heart from Carl,and the branches are from McGill (it looks similar to the one Martha Stewart came out with after McGill did).
But then there's the part of me that values equality. I want to be able to pay my own way before someone else does. I don't need someone to open doors for me, or pay for my dinner. Actually, when I was in my early and mid-twenties, I basically insisted that I handle my own way.
Slavin War Memorial
bow our heads with fear on our face,
B4 Paris Mixed Up
11. Down Down Down
5. The groom fainted
5. I then leave the camera, and go pour the collodion on the aluminum plate, tilting it back and forth until it runs and covers the entire plate. Then wait another minute for it to set up slightly. This can be done with room lights on.
Kumbh Vivah is just like a normal wedding. For example if a girl has a Manglik Dosh then she has to perform this ritual. Everything would be like the real wedding. Girl has to wear the wedding dress and jewelery along with a thread. Parents do "Kanya Daan" and "Phere" are also taken with the Mud pot. Priest has to be invited to chant the Mantra's and end up everything like a real human wedding. Later on the girl has to change the clothes, remove the thread and that thread is tied over the Mud pot and the pot later on is drown in some river or pond without letting some one know. Once the Ritual is done the girl is out of Manglik Dosh and she can now merry to the actual person and will not be having any further issues after wedding.Her husband is now safe from her Mangal Dosh.
When Lorelei’s old school mysteriously burns down, a new one appears practically overnight: Splendid Academy. Rock-climbing walls on the playground and golden bowls of candy on every desk? Gourmet meals in the cafeteria, served by waiters? Optional homework and two recess periods a day? It’s every kids’s dream.
Congressman Chip Cravaack (MN-08)
Pinksy ultimately acknowledged that the mayor’s office, the ESDC, and the state’s Washington (lobbying) office, had been involved.
I am still reading your wonderful fill-in-the-blank answers from my previous post. I’ve written many of you telling you how much I enjoy this small peek into your lives. And I thank you for that.
I’m justice wrapped in a plastic bag pressed against a whores ass
I think I'm going to withdraw my consent to be taxed by the Federal Government after this. Bank of America, as we have previously discussed, is exposed on Over-The-Counter forward contracts to the tune of $75 TRILLION, which is more than FIVE TIMES the total economic output of the United States in one year.
Mix together dry ingredients. Cut in shortening, careful not to over mix. Add vinegar and slowly add water, about a tablespoon at a time, until dough comes together. Roll dough between 2 pieces of parchment paper until it is a circle about 14" in diameter. Using the parchment paper to gently lift the dough, place it inside a 9" pie pan. Trim overhanging edges to 1" and fold under, using fingers to create decorative edge.
“The Dignity Act is so promising,” Ms. Miller said. “There’s no limit on the method of bullying. It applies to any kind of communication that creates a hostile environment for students.”
Those lovely people at Search Press sent me these three very pretty books before Christmas, and in all the flurry and bustle of seasonal excitement (not to mention the depths of my misery at having to take a sewing break) I forgot all about them until I did my little sort-out and tidy-up the other day and found them in my embroidery drawer.
I guess that was her way of not-so-subtly trying to see if I have a boyfriend or something. Great job, mom. :P As awkward as that conversation was, now that I think of it, it was quite funny.
I hung up and another thought entered my mind. If I had found a lost mail on a road or a sidewalk, I would have taken it to the closest mailbox and mailed it. So, in an improbable scenario where a stranger finds and mails my lost letter, Quill would receive the check which would mean that Quill and me would have to pay penalty for attempting to deposit a cancelled check. No good.
bouncing babies on our hips.
2nd Season of Game of Thrones
“And how old are you again?”
Must seek out and find
It sounded so good.
They rent out a cheap artists’ loft on the third floor of a teeny rundown apartment building. It’s a bit leaky, and it sort of sucks that their land lord is right above them. But it works.They’re passionate, instinctive, compulsive, and they know all the cool people. On slow nights, Asper A. Gus breezes in with his funky afro friends, Brock Lee and Callie Flower (pimp and strippa’, man). That’s cool for a little while, but they always tell the same stories, and Asper has a weird aftershave that lingers in the apartment.
Buddha replied: ” same theory, I take food and i feel the that i am full, I Practice and I attained enlightenment. Even though, we are close relatives, I can’t help you to attain enlightenment, its ALL DEPEND on you!”
When the movie came out last year, I thought it would enjoy a long run. It didn’t and I missed it. But it does well on Netflix, too.
Mondays = French class
1 stalk of celery
For the sake of our well being and freedom as men and women created not to be alone, it is so vital now that the church be a catalyst for rebuilding real communities in a very real way.
Drake is tasked with eliminating an East German assassin.
This development in Russia (with other legal battles related to it going on in places such as Belarus) has the potential to effect world markets given that 15 to 20 million investors are now involved and people the world over are looking for alternative investments outside of major currencies and commodities such as gold and silver. What is interesting about MMM is that has a lot of egalitarian, “everyday man” qualities to its branding that would appeal to Russians or those abroad who are tired of oligarchs taking all the big contracts… however, these were the people that lost tremendously in the 1990s.
Evonik told Reuters in Berlin that it is looking into alternative materials that can be used as a resin in those automotive systems without the component CDT.
But today, well this was it. This was what I always wanted. I wanted the chance to call on her, and for her to respond. I think she wanted to the chance to be needed. And we both wanted the opportunity to prove that no matter the time or years that have passed, no matter the lack of knowledge we have about how to play out our roles, we are still mother and daughter.
I must lie among those who breathe forth fire,
Is this a newfound zen-like equilibrium? Or a disturbing acclimatisation to danger?
But P, who as I've mentioned sat to C's left, began noticing things. He noticed that C was pressing his hand, not against the left side of his head, but against his left ear, as if he were trying to block out sound from that side. We also noticed that C often seemed distressed at meals, and that he would make angry grunting noises (which is something he does when stressed). It didn't take long to connect the dots and figure out that C was trying to block out the sound of P's chewing, either by covering that ear or, if/when that didn't work, by making other sounds himself to mask the chewing sounds.
“And as they cried out, and cast off their clothes, and threw dust into the air.”
17 bottles of antique beers, ales and lagers, spanning from 1953 to 1981,
With everything that's going on, I just couldn't get in the right frame of mind to do something, but thanks to Ann I still get to participate!!
Nigeria ( FAAN).
Isn’t it better to regret things you’ve done, than regret things you’ve never even tried?
THE CABINET OF EARTHS is what I can't help calling "deliciously strange". At turns creepy, fun, tender, and deeply thought-provoking, it's filled with descriptions you want to read two or three times before continuing on. A book to be savored, not rushed through. And I fell into THE EXCEPTIONALS and didn't want to come back out. I especially loved Claire's connection to the hawk and all the other "specials". I heard about both books through The Enchanted Inkpot blog. I'm now in the middle of CLOCKWORK PRINCE: Book Two of The Infernal Devices series by Cassandra Clare. I forget where I first heard about book 1, CLOCKWORK ANGEL, but I picked up Book Two because I loved Clare's Steampunk/Fantasy world and her characters. Though I've been reading more ebooks lately, I read these in hardcover.
But I really wish it felt like autumn. It was 85 degrees when I packed up the harp and set out for an outdoor wedding. To think — when I contracted for this wedding, I was worried about being cold and keeping my fingers warm.
To ones that are known
It’s easy to identify the ways that Dewey’s problems were unique, such as guaranteeing partner compensation and issuing bonds. Leaders of other firms could benefit from a different exercise: assessing how their own institutions are similar to what Dewey & LeBoeuf became after their 2007 merger. Growing partnership inequality is pervasive and its implications are profound.
Last month, one of our students, an undergraduate at the Faculty of Engineering, posted offensive remarks about Singaporeans online. He has since been counselled and has apologised unreservedly.
said it.
If I get involved in playing music again outside my teaching work I think it's going to be simply because I want to, and not because I'm being paid to. That'll probably mean playing free improv (see video, below) and there's not much chance of running into anyone who's into that round here, although you never know.
What is it with dust? How does it always know where I am?
1 likely
Yudhiṣṭhira performed this mental dedication after fulfilling all his worldly responsibilities and duties and before taking any external dress or behavior of a renunciate.
Declan Normashild (All Gr Soc NHS) 88
This morning, the Central Bank of Ireland (CBI) has released its monthly snapshot of the state of Irish banks focussing on deposits and lending. The data covers the period up to 29th February 2012 and shows that during the month of February 2012, deposits by ordinary households and businesses actually increased at the so-called “covered” or State-supported banks – essentially the two pillar banks, Bank of Ireland and AIB, and also Permanent TSB. The increase of €125m from €102.6bn in January 2012 to €102.7bn in February 2012 was modest enough but means that private sector deposits at covered banks are at their highest level since June 2011 though the figures below show there has been a stabilisation rather than a recovery. Private sector deposits fell at covered banks in the past 12 months by €6bn from €109bn to €103bn, but most of that fall took place in the first six months of 2011 and since July 2011, the figures have been stable. I think it is fair to say there are signs of stabilisation, but it would be a gross exaggeration to claim “deposits were flowing” into Irish banks.
Another screaming album? (Please?) More of your late night talk show that I don’t get in my country but I am working on acquiring by illegally hacking a satellite feed through my government’s secret security forces? (Please?) An appearance on Bill Maher?
I slunk to the nurse's office after bleeding all over the seat in English class but Scott F. spied me and screamed, when he saw my stained pants, "ASPLENIA HAS HER PERIOD!!!" in megaphone voice. The entire hall turned and looked. Goddamn that boy could yell. I've never seen anyone with a healthier set of lungs.
--Number 20 Bayard
My first holiday abroad was in Benidorm in the days before it was a TV series.
Milibandi. Eddy Eddy.
Sally, test subject one, had been easiest to train. Her mind was a near total blank, and under stress her heart rate increased, but her mental functions almost flat lined. Judd had been ecstatic. As an administrator he had reviewed her course studies and grades and wasn't surprised at his conclusions. Judd taught her simple breathing techniques and a little meditation, which she took to extremely fast, and Sally was fine. As for the end of the world, she was more interested in how it would interfere with mascara and hair care than anything else.
The starting point itself can be quite fun. It's not just showing up that makes getting into that remote and unfriendly spot you want to visit. One of the places where a Kopfy tunnel, that's a dungeon to you D&Dheads, differ from the Ken St Andre tunnel is the entrance. Mind you Ken's are great, his dungeons are challenges set by God-Wizards to mere punkass adventurers, so they are floating in the sky, or massive doors carved into the side of mountains with toll collectors waiting in front for entrance. But for there's this little adventure series with a protagonist named "Indiana Jones" a couple of you dear readers might have heard of. One of the hallmarks of this collection of little-known films is the difficulty in finding the treasure, and perils of the tunnels around it, is usually very hard to get to. Mind you all, I was into pulp adventure a decade before Raiders of the Lost Arc was written. So I like this part of any tunnelcrawl to be a task in and of itself. From puzzles as to how to find the entrance, the ever popular sunset or sunrise shooting through a gem onto a map; to my favorite gravity salad.
It was very easy to make and tasted very good. The whole family enjoyed it!
Minneapolis Minnesota
Ominous, ain't it?
4: Goldnight commander(W), Midvast Protector(W), Elgaud shieldmate(U)
So, our surprise was palpable (and palatable) when the waiter returned with a bowl of marinated and jullianed onions (or cebollas in Spanish).
Snack: Zone Perfect Perfectly Simple Peanut Crunch bar (If you haven't seen these YUM!! only 6 ingredients!)
I have had some unexpected time this afternoon, and so decided to put together a quick post. I am feeling so very grateful right now as my mom is doing soo much better! We played cards again Friday night after bringing them over a little dinner and giving my mom a beautiful bouquet of flowers in honor of Mother's Day. The fragrance of flowers was soo sweet and somewhat overwhelming in their small place, but we all just LOVED it. The girls have won two weeks in a row btw, and so we are on a definite roll it seems, haha. She has only been off the medication 3 days but it has already made such a big difference. She was MUCH more clear headed and walked around pretty good. In fact, when she used her walker she was downright speedy, lol. She was just so much happier. What a relief. Now I won't pretend that she was 100 percent, but then neither am I most of the time. : ) My step dad does continue to go down hill and has become so thin it is truly unbelievable. He sits at the table in obvious pain, using his oxygen, with his hands shaking from fatigue. And yet he is as sharp as he ever was, and was in high spirits just because my mom was doing so much better. I know he hangs on just for her, and plays cards when he would probably be more comfortable doing nothing at all, because he knows she wants to play. I have watched him love for her for almost 25 years now and I can tell you she is one blessed lady to have him. It is really hard for her to watch him decline, and I have absolutely no idea how she will ever manage without him.
(Rightly do they love you.) Still speaking directly to her Beloved, she tells Him she understands completely why the daughters love Him. Can you imagine how that makes Him feel? After all, He created us for companionship with Him. To love Him with our own free will. Whether we are walking in immaturity or the fullness of maturity, we are still His Bride. We love Him because He first loved us. And as we continue to know Him more, He will reveal Himself more, and cause our love for Him to grow.
La Horde is one of the bloodiest and more violent zombie movies of recent years. The zombies here are of the ’28 Days Later’ type, they’re quick and savage, and are dispatched with guns, axes, machetes and even fists in some very violent scenes. There are a few exceptional action scenes; the first encounter with the undead is gory and chaotic, and a great scene with Aurore battering a zombie in a small kitchen using her fists, feet, a cupboard door, glass ashtray and eventually the fridge. The whole last third of the movie is extremely gory and blood splattered and should keep most hardcore zombie fans fairly happy.
Strawberry and White Chocolate Tart
e) Volunteer your friends family and coworkers (:))
“As I was saying,” Beck continued. “whatever happens today, you’ll all be regarded as heroes back home. And remember, we all agreed that whomever is selected today will have died in the line of duty, and given a burial in space. A hero’s burial, just like Blackmore.”
The police are now enforcing the law rather than being inhibited by or being over-familiar with the tabloid press.
In addition, there’s a potential political war looming in the not-so-far distance, one between the Boomers now facing a bleak retirement and younger generations trying to get their starts in life.
“Sadly, my socks are like snowflakes, no two are exactly alike.”
March 24, Nanay Flotie (Nanay Nene to others) “crossed over.” The pain from an accidental fall 88 days earlier led to the discovery that she was suffering from renal failure. Last midnight, when the Villariba clan gathered after the Easter rites, we missed her motherly hosting of clan celebrations.
My response to this question used to be either, “I’m not here for your entertainment” or “I’ll do it for a dollar,” depending on how I felt that day.
shhhh! no lectures please.
I had almost decided to quit- I felt detached from the whole blogging world.
He was responding to question by Senior Parliamentary Secretary for Foreign Affairs Sam Tan on whether the health ministry can reintroduce fee guidelines and improve financial counselling for patients.
I have alot of amazing musical talent in my family and circle of friends. So, during dinner and while people were mingling, we we thought it would be cool to have some live music performed by some special people in our life. I loved this part of the reception, and so did our guests. Here is my brother in law and sister singing "Ain't No Mountain High Enough". They were precious :)
I’m not done yet with the appetizers and the ideas for snacks. In fact, since I’m in Morocco these days, I’m enjoying the freshly made brik sheets which are a healthier option than other types of wrapping.
"I don't understand," I said, climbing to my feet. Turlo handed me a water sack, and I drank down more water than I ever thought I had consumed in both tours in Afghanistan combined. He held another sack out to me afterward -- cold roasted corn, but I declined. I couldn't take any more.
3. I have been overweight ever since I can remember- since age 7 I think. I think the last time I ever saw under 200 pounds was when I was 17 and it wasn't much under. (I just figured out how to use apostrophes on this keyboard I think - yahoo)
It's Monday, and I have a busy and fun week(end) ahead!
whatever happened, I would at least treat myself to some lunch on the
I do have Coco here with me, and I love that. The other day, she sat in my lap while I read my book. Do you know how hard it is to read a 450-page hardback book with a not-so-little dog sitting in your lap? But I was enjoying her company too much to make her get down.
I should be thankful for the day-by-day surcease from the pain that had kept me hobbled these past months, surcease partial but sufficient - as long as I do the daily 30 minutes therapy.
1 can diced roma tomatoes
Most of us take water for granted. When we turn on spigots, we expect that precious resource to simply flow. Let us take a moment to follow that flow back to the place where it all begins—Mother Nature.
After that we go back to Jason again. His family tries to force him to eat The Stuff, as it is obviously possessing them at this point and making them insane and evil. He gets away by substituting shaving cream for The Stuff and eating the shaving cream instead, only his dad figures it out and they all chase him outside, where Mo arrives in his car, having heard about the supermarket incident earlier that day. Jason gets in the car and tells him about what happened. Mo, ever a master of diction, responds with the following verbal poetry:
Alex's Mother, on the other hand was much more "traditional" Navajo. She still is for that matter. She wanted her kids to speak Navajo, go to "Indian School" and embrace their culture above all. His Dad wanted the kids to be Americans first. Neither of Alex's parents got exactly what they wanted, but I think they got the best of both worlds.
That bright, yellow metal that has launched countless wars and built numerous empires has started its striking come back and all because of the blow back from the vary nation that had sabotaged its initial place in the world economy.
Cabinet Secretaries Notebooks. The eleventh Notebook (CAB 195/11) (released August 2007) covers the period 3.12.52 - 26.2.54.
Back when I was dating Jason I found out Eric Hutchinson would be playing in Omaha at the Waiting Room Lounge. Since Jason had been paying for our past few dates, and we had similar taste in music, I thought I might splurge and buy tickets for us to see the show. Of course, since we had talked about dating until school got out I never would have guessed we wouldn’t be dating when the concert came around… Next time I buy concert tickets for a date I’m going to have the guy sign a contract binding him to still be a romantic interest when the concert rolls around so I don’t waste my money.
ND - Well, the current rules would apply to any club, and what’s not fair is to change the rules within the season. The current rules are that is an application for a transfer of a share comes into the SPL board…
E. Stereyeland
By overcoming the adversity and challenges we face in life.
The amendment passed by the Lords calls for MPs and peers to divert attention from criticisms by healthcare professionals and instructs members to avert their eyes or cover their ears whenever anything negative is mentioned about the reforms.
I promise I'll post some video excerpts of the concert for you to enjoy. So stay tuned! But for the next few days I'll be resting and reorganizing, letting my thoughts unravel, creating a clear slate in preparation for the rest of December's performances.
I never mean that MLM is not good as entrepreneurship, even "Rich dad, poor dad" also highly recommend that MLM is one good way to start your own careers, if you do not have big money pipeline, the piramid system is helping to generate money by having your downlines to work for you and you get income from their outputs, but it never be my cup of tea.
Orion Publishing Group (Orion, Weidenfeld & Nicolson, Gollancz)
P.S. My mom and sis also introduced me to a guy you might have heard of... Philip Phillips? If you love Dave Matthews (or really cute guys who can sing and play guitar), I also recommend checking him out on American Idol. I think I fell in love... sorry hunny!
Transfer the dough once again onto a floured surface and punch it down using your fist. This will help removing the air bubbles. Knead for about a minute and then divide into six portions. Make balls.
I was, however, the observant type.
eggs
"Even if they do get further training, it leaves them without experience."
In the last month, the city has practically gone on strike. Halifax On Strike! Well, some have, many have threatened and most of the public has complained one way or the other.
To the feet and the toes,
Set a colander over a bowl. Cut the eggplant in half and scoop out the pulp from both halves. Place in colander and allow to drain for about 5 minutes.
There have been a couple of personal setbacks:
so here's a little rambling for you -
Here is a closeup of the image (copic colours used note below).....Please also note, that I used a craft knife to make two slits in the side of the images' shape to be able to thread the ribbon through to "hold down the image".....
The marriage is not joyous. There is not love there at all. Ada does not show any affection to Stewart. It really bothers him. When Stewart leaves for a quick trip, Ada and Flora come knocking on the door of Baines to ask to go get the piano. In exchange for getting her piano back into her possession, Baines asks her to teach him how to play. The catch is that he doesn’t want to play, he wants to see Ada plays. Their lessons become increasingly awkward as Baines slowly seduces her.
During the next 7 days I encourage you to follow links, watch video, read blogs and other messages to follow. In this season of Thanksgiving, with so much we have to be thankful for, open your heart and mind to the ways God is using Hope2Africa to shower hope on our brothers and sisters living and ministering in South African Squatter camps.
I was in a tough time in my life, going from kid to preteen, and Relda became a very good friend. I would, very contentedly, talk to Relda–quite at length, as a matter of fact. Relda did most of the talking, though. He is kinda an attention hog. He interrupts even more than I do.
Now from this point on in the film goes into its attempts to put our two stars into zany situations that occur during your typical romantic comedy (that genre used loosely in this case). This would include Gigli finding out his mother "experimented" in her younger days, the hostage causing a ruckus in public/in the home, Ricki's ex-girlfriend somehow showing up at Gigli's apartment wanting her back and then proceeding to slit her wrists when she doesn't comply, you know, funny stuff. There's also a wonderful scene between Gigli and Ricki have a discussion about which genders "form" is more appealing. This was accompanied by J-Lo doing a full six minutes of yoga poses while talking about her "form", If anyone was in the theatre, I question if they actually heard a single word she said since they they were most likely staring/questioning her form as she talked about her "form" (I think I might have just confused myself).
The backstory….Being the coolest girlfriend ever, (yeah, I said girlfriend) I wanted to do something sweet for Subway’s birthday (by the way its tomorrow). My idea was to take pictures of Dawson all decked out in birthday gear (b’day hat, banner and confetti) then turn these pictures into a super adorable b’day card. I know, I’m so stinking cute!
As for editing, I'll be candid here. My last four print releases, all done my major houses, required very little editing. That's because I have writing peers who help me vet my manuscripts.
The Origins blogfest is very similar, which makes me so excited! I can't wait to read everyone's Origin story. Last time, I wrote about what gave me the spark to write. This is what gave me the spark to BECOME A WRITER.
This beer has a ton of different malts in it. Let’s just keep it simple shall we? The blend of pale malts makes this more complex so at least use two if you can. Some Golden Promise and Optic work very nicely but use what you can. The Mild malt can be replaced if you can’t get it with any type of pale…there isn’t enough to make that big of a difference. The two big keys to this beer are the caramel and the lactose. If you don’t have access to caramel, don’t worry about it. If you do, you’ll see you need about 30srm (60ebc). Is it needed, no, but for all those that have it, its easy enough to do. The lactose. You need it. The beer won’t be the same without. Go and find it if your shop doesn’t have it. Crunch hippy stores usually have it. Add it any time during the boil.
Happy Thursday!! xo.
This place is a mixture of self-pity but also immense dignity (or so I can think)! It includes the following emotions and thoughts:
This is right after I jumped on the bed, and right before Foster Mom told me to get off the freshly-washed blankets n stuff with my dirty outside paws.
However, there is that one girl who does make-up tutorial and such. She is cute and I enjoyed watching her (not for the tutorial really, mostly because of her look and her voice). Last week she up loaded a fashion video and I saw what styles she tried to show her viewers but, to be quite frank, she failed. I have no idea what came over me but I decided to write her a message, telling her that she should maybe stick with the make-up because the fashion thing was not her thing. I tried to make it as positive as possible, I used the word "sorry" a lot and I really didn't mean to offend her, I just wanted to give her some feedback but of course she got offended.
staring right at u and all u can think of is CHICKEN SCHNITZEL.......
The Recipe:
Beltain, the pagan fire holiday is due to take place tomorrow(and the next day). It is a holiday of beginnings, of putting seeds of mind and matter into the appropriate environment. It is a holiday preparing for hard work and growth and it the holiday to seal committed relationships in order to make them fertile and strong.
17For in one hour so great riches is come to nought. And every shipmaster, and all the company in ships, and sailors, and as many as trade by sea, stood afar off,
Sleepy Hollow:
That's it for this year folks, thanks for your support throughout 2011 and for stopping by today. The LG Report wishes you all the best in 2012, may it be your happiest year yet!
And several six packs of LA-31 beer.
As a person who has received this question and understand how annoying it can be, I admit to wondering it about other homeschoolers at times. I almost always intend the silent question to come from a place of genuine interest (though there are situations where it is thought, I admit, with a "tinge of disgust," - yes, I'm human and have negative thoughts from time to time). Despite the good intentions behind my wondering, however, I generally refrain from asking the forbidden query. I have asked the more acceptable questions such as, "Do you do fill-in-the-blank activities? and "What do you do for fill-in-the-blank?" And while I know it's unfair to act based on a half-dozen experiences, I refrain from asking many questions to unschoolers as in the past the defensiveness that accompanied the answer was too much to take. It felt like they thought I was challenging their philosophy instead of genuinely want to hear about what unschooling looks like (which is probably exactly how I've sounded when I do my sarcastic or defensive bit with non-homeschoolers). Naturally this is just my experience and in no way do I think all unschoolers would answer a question defensively, but it did make me realize that what people "do all day" is absolutely none of my business, whether I wonder it out of a curiosity aimed at improving and expanding my horizons, or plain and simple nosiness. And it also made me realize that many times, we hear things based on our intentions, not necessarily those of the person asking. I many interpret something as being asked with a "tinge of disgust," but that may not necessarily be the case. I know I never asked an unschooler about their day out of a sense of judgment, but maybe that has been their experience and they were geared up for it (much like I'm geared up to answer the "what about socialization" question).
That's the game of the name, I suppose.
I chose the image because my brother always looks after my springer spaniel Jack when I go on holiday - Jack adores him and follows him everywhere! I hope he likes it, because if he doesn't, he's getting nothing else!!!
Of course I went. I'd seen Clinton in...'94?...and couldn't remember a word he'd said and wanted to see if Obama could do better. Opting for comfort (a relative term in a situation like this) over being metal-detected and waiting in line to get into the main venue, we stopped at the first video screen we came to on 17 Juni, and that turned out to have been a great decision.
was a Saturday we spent driving
Our hope is for our kids to know that: Faith is believing in Jesus even though we can’t see Him
Loudly yours,
6. Prelude/Angry Young Man – 5:17
My mom immediately started blaming me. It was all my fault. She told the cops and social worker that I asked for it. I pranced around in little nighties and panties. Well, she was the one who bought my clothes, I wore what she gave me. They whisked me away to a foster home that night. I was there for six months until he was in prison.
I suppose it begins there. But not really.
It's such a blessing to live near my parents and sister who are more than willing to watch and love on our little bug! Thank you, family!
I know we've all had times in our lives when we feel as if things "suck." I'm actually going through that now as it pertains to my relationship with someone I love very much. We have apparently broken up. I say "apparently," because I'm still feeling shocked by it all and in disbelief. We had a great relationship. We always had so much fun! We loved each other passionately, joyfully, playfully and the feelings were alive. We could be who we are, without judgment, and allow each other the freedom to be ourselves and love, play, laugh and live life well! That was how I felt about "us." This is how God (or Source) sees each and everyone of us everyday.
I chose The Fog to kick off this chapter because no film better exemplifies what I desire from “fun horror”. Here my fellow horror fans might wonder if I’ve lost my mind. Few would call The Fog Carpenter’s best horror movie (nor would I). Most wouldn’t put it in the top five. Out of all the stone cold classics that Carpenter has delivered to the genre, Halloween, The Thing or even Prince Of Darkness, why would I choose this ramshackled shaggy dog of a movie? Though the film contains many of Carpenter’s trademarks, working class asskickers facing up to a threat larger than they are, a shapeless ambigious force of evil, dark secrets of the upper class, and of course the trademark pounding synth score, it’s also a movie that was extensively reshot and shows it. A film whose own internal cohesion is at best lax and only just hangs together as a coherent story.
lookin' good, eh? 'cept dat tings ain't always what dey seem so...it's tippy time for the craigslist find! (ain't unintended rhyme a delight?)
You have on a gray velour workout suit that says ‘PINK’ across your backside.
The rich girl sat in her doorway in all her finery, and when the prince approached she bowed before him. He looked at her, said not a word, and rode on.
Gonna live, laugh and learn right to the very end.
It hasn't been easy considering how sick I've been. I'm still incredibly nauseous on a daily basis, and I've been having contractions for over a month. I'm anemic. I blacked out several times in the second trimester. I'm in constant severe pain.
*Rest 2 minutes.
The lack of new posts is not down to lack of incident, joy or trauma in my life. I’ve been preoccupied.
I’m sure it has everything to do with my believing that Santa is real and every act of kindness, done by we adults, to others is not only because of our spiritual need to express our love and gratitude to Christ and God but also to express our human side to mankind. Christmas, is indeed, a very miraculous time of year and it is important that we adults, do understand, it is about the children. Just as the Magi presented gifts to the Christ child, so should we present gifts to the children, granted us through God.
What was I to do?
And lastly, hope the artists nominated will do the above and keep the award going by accepting and awarding ''The Liebster Blog Award'' to 5 special bloggers that they too would like to honor.
G : Gale-force Winds: Mammy and Daddy take us out even when it’s windy. We love the feel of the wind in our fur. A Windy Walk
For centuries, writers have sung the virtues of staying connected to the routine and the mundane. Real creativity should feel like a game, not a career. Having to hang out the washing or get up and make breakfast helps you remember that your "work" is actually fun. And for it to stay fun, you have to be unafraid of failure. It's very powerful to be surrounded by people who love you for something other than your work, who are unaware of the daily, painful fluctations of your reputation. I discovered recently that my youngest child thought I spent my days typing out more and more copies of my book Millions, so that everyone could have one.
I know what I need to do to get published, but I need to put that knowledge to work for me and my manuscripts.
This state of ambiguity is so repulsive to the institutional church. When I was at my wit’s end, and in the last gasps of living in a naive state that had me suckered into believing that a community of institutional christians would actually WANT to remove itself out of the ”futileness” of a church system, I concluded that the overall corporate sense of ambiguity that began to emerge in the church I attended was actually the best thing that could possibly happen to me. The church was getting large and was heading into a state of vagueness, which for me was my wake-up call.
EPUB 3 supposed to be backwardly compatible with 2, so we won’t have to go back and update older documents when the reading systems upgrade. He expects that reading devices will be up to EPUB 3 in 2012.
The Naked Town (Japan…Tomu Uchida)
Collection 2000 Lasting Perfection Concealer
In a cake mixing bowl, mix the flour, 2 table spoons of cinnamon powder, the baking powder and the pinch of salt.
“I’ve never had this much confidence for anything in my life. She hated the jokester…,”
you need a ticket and a bottle of sweet smelling liquid.
Compulsion 5.2 Average
MS punch- monarch butterfly, sewingmachine
For today's article, The Local tried to check with the malls, reporting:
When it comes to making kits, my slight tendencies towards OCD really comes in handy. I really have to be methodical about it 1) to keep my brain entertained when spending 15+ hours making the same thing over and over and 2) to make sure each and every kit really *is* one of a kind. I have really come to enjoy and look forward to creating the limited edition color combinations just for special teaching events. (You might remember the 2010 ArtBliss set and the 2011 set.)
- iPad Reports
08 Saviour
Did you not see the twinkle in my fuckin eye? Did I stutter?
Sewing machine and supplies
Here is the link to the whole calendar:
The sun finally peeked out from behind the clouds in Baker. It was still cloudy and drizzling. When we looked in our rear view mirror we saw the most beautiful rainbow we had ever seen. I got the camera out but I could not fit the entire rainbow in my camera. This was the first time that I had ever seen a complete rainbow. The pictures don't even come close to how beautiful it really was.
What a beautiful day today has been. The sun has been emitting its long warm rays and giving us a taste of warmth and sense of the seasons ahead. Signs of Spring are beginning to emerge from the recently snow covered soil. How much happier does it make us feel when we can spend time outside enjoying the free gifts of nature.
Yehudi
So, which brand of front bike seat? We've tried two...
Doesn't this little skirt make you want to have another baby? NO??? Well, honestly, me neither. Having babies in the family is enough to make me happy. Since one of my kids woke me up during the night this week, and she's 12 (ear infection), I'll happily let others do the all night shift. I will, however, keep making cute clothes and might have to make some to sell!
his eyes like we do.
Probably more. Everything falls to me, so I have to make sure I step it up. All the meals, clean-up, diaper changes, bedtimes, dog walking, locking down the house so the killer doesn't get me, etc.... I'm the only one.
